{"post-90463": {"user": "Chesknight", "user_num": 2708, "timestamp": "1558715152000", "message": "While not entirely accurate by human estimations, the fae of the Summer Court often celebrate the traditional festival of Midsomar whenever enough of them get the same idea. Often multiple times a summer and a couple of times, just to spite the Winter Court, on a particularly warm December day. The fog had rolled over much of the Fae's gathering point, cutting them from their usual home. Cast about and despondent many had scattered about, losing contact with their fellows. Today, however, they once again flocked back towards a central point. A key event that had spread far and wide called to them, literally and figuratively. A true, Midsomar festival! Most Fae knew the Chestknight. You didn't live for eternity and not know your drinking buddy's name after all!\u00a0The day was blue skied and warm, though surprisingly not nearly as hot as one might have expected. Weather was funny that way, if enough fae were thinking about it. As if in anticipation of its guests, it seemed as if the circle of mushrooms had widened, encircling a swath of land replace with fallen trees as long benches, polished stumps and chairs seemingly grown from single bursts of wood and vines. The tables were laden with berries and fruit from a common apple, to more exotic pineapples to the downright bizarre. Pink melons shaped like pears with orange flesh within, and spiky fruits that smelled absolutely foul when opened, yet tasted sweeter than most had ever experienced.\u00a0Already the fae danced, both zipping through the air, in couples upon the floor or alone, sometimes with invisible partners. Not everyone was in the Material Realm at the moment, but that didn't stop them from enjoying the festivities. Off near one of the edges of the field was a stump, the diameter of which suggested a tree of monstrous proportions. The surface was worn and polished, with roots running along the base that made it easy to climb down from, for the cut was about five feet from the earth. Upon it were musicians and singers, filling the air with the warmth of their music. Buzzing around, a few fairies held trays of nuts and berries, small pasties filled with pink foam (and occasionally a foul-tasting paste in the mix, just to liven things up a bit) and held pitches of wines and a thick, honey-like alcohol, smooth and deceptively intoxicating.\u00a0Among the fae with both peasants and nobility, for the invitations did not discriminate. Anyone the host had ever met, and a few he hadn't had received a personal invitation with no regards or favors to those of a higher status. Tables held no regards for status, and had any prince arrived he may find himself rubbing elbows with an impoverished farmer and a well-worn adventurer. Even beasts were allowed, although few had shown themselves as of yet. Yet within the festivities was the air of being closely regarded. Trouble would not be tolerated, and although one may not see a guard from where they were standing, it frequently made the implications of being a \"Bad guest\" that much more intimidating, for beneath each fae's twinkling eyes and sunny face was the spirit of something much older, and much darker.\u00a0Near the stage, at its own table was one section almost isolated from the rest. Near it, a modest throne made from weaved wood and wreathed in vines sporting an impossible selection of strawberries, blackberries and so forth. Currently it was empty as, despite the openness of the festival there was one \"entryway\" most guests found themselves gravitating towards and at that entryway stood the Chestknight in all his glory. He looked his typical, rotund self, and yet his cape was wreathed with nuts and berries that seemed to grow in spite of whether or not such things grew together or on vines at all.\u00a0His amber eyes were squinted in what could only be a grin as he greeted the guests that came into the field, all of whom he seemed to know by name. The Midsomar Festival was in full bloom.\u00a0(A few magical effects permeate the air here at the Midsomar's Festival, as old as the very earth they dance upon. One finds their inhibitions lowered, although by amounts difficult to quantify between individuals. A most stern schoolmistress might find herself merely tapping her foot along with the music, or else she might be dancing upon the tables, belting out drinking songs. The level of the effect is exactly to the amount that is fun for you, the player. On the other hand, a more firm, powerful magic lurks as well. Those with aggression, find they cannot quite bring themselves to draw their weapons. While they are not confiscated, this is only because even the most powerful and magic resistant are bound to the power of Mother Nature on this most holy of celebrations. If people wish to battle, it must be taken outside the Fairy Circle and away from the partygoers, although they may follow as they wish.)", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "While not entirely accurate by human estimations, the fae of the Summer Court often celebrate the traditional festival of Midsomar whenever enough of them get the same idea. Often multiple times a summer and a couple of times, just to spite the Winter Court, on a particularly warm December day. The fog had rolled over much of the Fae's gathering point, cutting them from their usual home. Cast about and despondent many had scattered about, losing contact with their fellows. Today, however, they once again flocked back towards a central point. A key event that had spread far and wide called to them, literally and figuratively. A true, Midsomar festival! Most Fae knew the Chestknight. You didn't live for eternity and not know your drinking buddy's name after all!\u00a0"}, "post-90464": {"user": "Judikael", "user_num": 2945, "timestamp": "1558715627000", "message": "Skirting the peripheral of the festivities a figure lurked so unlike the rest of the merrygoers. A headless creature, a skeletal head of which was bound about his swordbelt. Judikael, a dark creature of the Winter Court, was not invited to join among the merryment of the Midsomar. Yet, he had seen it for the opportunity that it was: A chance for those scattered Fae to return, and perhaps in the effort reconnect on the strange, emphatic level that linked them. He had come not as guest, nor friend or even foe. He was, at the moment, a watchful guardian. Other dullahan, those of whom he had managed to press once more into his service too stalked about, prepared to handle any issue that might arise with deadly efficiency. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Skirting the peripheral of the festivities a figure lurked so unlike the rest of the merrygoers. A headless creature, a skeletal head of which was bound about his swordbelt. Judikael, a dark creature of the Winter Court, was not invited to join among the merryment of the Midsomar. Yet, he had seen it for the opportunity that it was: A chance for those scattered Fae to return, and perhaps in the effort reconnect on the strange, emphatic level that linked them. He had come not as guest, nor friend or even foe. He was, at the moment, a watchful guardian. Other dullahan, those of whom he had managed to press once more into his service too stalked about, prepared to handle any issue that might arise with deadly efficiency. "}, "post-90465": {"user": "Rook", "user_num": 2900, "timestamp": "1558716174000", "message": "Rook danced and sang, swigging large gulps of the thick, syrupy drinks as they sloshed about to the grass beneath him.  His delicate hooves pattered on the grass, as he joined one fae, then another on a seemingly unending train of contained excitement. Even the very best of human celebrations never seemed to quite scratch his itch for fun, and he had been one of the first to arrive when word of a Midsomar had reached his ears. Peering around, his golden eyes sought familiar faces, or even better: New, pretty faces. The music that poured from the stage like a decanter refreshed him and his zeal and without concern he took to dancing once again.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Rook danced and sang, swigging large gulps of the thick, syrupy drinks as they sloshed about to the grass beneath him.  His delicate hooves pattered on the grass, as he joined one fae, then another on a seemingly unending train of contained excitement. Even the very best of human celebrations never seemed to quite scratch his itch for fun, and he had been one of the first to arrive when word of a Midsomar had reached his ears. Peering around, his golden eyes sought familiar faces, or even better: New, pretty faces. The music that poured from the stage like a decanter refreshed him and his zeal and without concern he took to dancing once again."}, "post-90467": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1558718912000", "message": "Faisine had been in relative solitude for the last few years, lending her hand in places where her services were needed but not staying in any one place for longer than necessary, and had been wandering the free lands for quite some time. It might not have seemed fair of her to disappear after finding a man who could have had her for a wife, or the fact that she had helped to liberate the women of the fallen Medan during the tail end of the Goraian war and the downfall of that state. She\u2019d needed time to be alone after such a time, and she had simply never cared to re-enter society and act the noble, the rightful Duchess of what used to be land not far from Medan and the Usque. It was the remainder of the Usque that she wandered for the most part.No longer the child that served to act spiteful toward others out of jealousy after the great cataclysm in which the whole world had been torn asunder, Faisine was a woman grown and matured beyond her years. She had taken over the role of guardian for the forest for the time since her cousin\u2019s child was not yet of age to protect the place. And it was in the Usque that she received a most peculiar letter that somehow just made it into her hands and invited her to a festival she had never heard of. It was then that the young Faisine took herself from the enchanted forest and began her journey to this place of celebration.The woman who stood just outside and was looking in was clad in soft wool and doeskin, her tapered digits curled around her staff and her feet planted at shoulder width, a crown or rowan settled atop her soft, platinum waves and blue eyes regarding her new surroundings with no small amount of curiosity. The spellsong found herself entering into the area where the festival was, wandering about silently, lifting her water skin to her lips for a sip of cool h2o, and she watched as others milled about while listening to the hum of conversation.If asked, she would present the letter and murmur, \u201cI am Faisine, Guardian-regent of the Usque.\u201d Her voice, slightly huskier than it had been when she was younger, was still strong and sure, authoritative and almost sing song. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Faisine had been in relative solitude for the last few years, lending her hand in places where her services were needed but not staying in any one place for longer than necessary, and had been wandering the free lands for quite some time. It might not have seemed fair of her to disappear after finding a man who could have had her for a wife, or the fact that she had helped to liberate the women of the fallen Medan during the tail end of the Goraian war and the downfall of that state. She\u2019d needed time to be alone after such a time, and she had simply never cared to re-enter society and act the noble, the rightful Duchess of what used to be land not far from Medan and the Usque. It was the remainder of the Usque that she wandered for the most part."}, "post-90469": {"user": "Chesknight", "user_num": 2708, "timestamp": "1558720144000", "message": "The Chestknight was being as certain as he could to greet every guest as they entered, but there were many. As such, he took it upon himself to identify those he had not caught entering. It was not so difficult a thing to notice Faisine, as her heavenly beauty was tempered by the touch of a faraway forest. Fae hovered around her, as if merely excited to be in her presence, giggling and glancing, some outright staring. As the Chestknight approached, however, the creatures quickly scattered with small shrieks of pretend fear like schoolgirls being chased with a bucket of water by a childhood crush. The knight was hardly what one might expect from another who held such a title. He was short, with a prodigious girth in a peculiar nut-like armor. Closing the distance he gave a deep bow, his acorn head nearly brushing the grass in the act. \"You have my greatest thanks for joining us here, Faisine, Guardian-regent of the Usque.\" he announced, with a voice several times larger and more noble than his appearance would suggest. \"It pleases me to have yet another guardian of the forest among us. Please, eat and make merry! Know that among the Midsomar you will come to no harm.\" With that the fae knight straightened to his full, unimpressive height, amber eyes gazing up at the taller, slender figure before him. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Chestknight was being as certain as he could to greet every guest as they entered, but there were many. As such, he took it upon himself to identify those he had not caught entering. It was not so difficult a thing to notice Faisine, as her heavenly beauty was tempered by the touch of a faraway forest. Fae hovered around her, as if merely excited to be in her presence, giggling and glancing, some outright staring. As the Chestknight approached, however, the creatures quickly scattered with small shrieks of pretend fear like schoolgirls being chased with a bucket of water by a childhood crush. The knight was hardly what one might expect from another who held such a title. He was short, with a prodigious girth in a peculiar nut-like armor. "}, "post-90472": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1558721632000", "message": "She gave a graceful bow, and she would say, \u201cTell me, Sir Acorn, why I have been invited to such an event? I have been quite absent from society for some time now and I was fairly certain my name is not one to travel upon the lips of others. You\u2019ve honored me, a stranger from afar.\u201d Indeed, it had been a surprise to have received the letter of invitation. Her piercing blue eyes peered down at the small figure, which was saying something since she was small herself, a petite young woman.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She gave a graceful bow, and she would say, \u201cTell me, Sir Acorn, why I have been invited to such an event? I have been quite absent from society for some time now and I was fairly certain my name is not one to travel upon the lips of others. You\u2019ve honored me, a stranger from afar.\u201d Indeed, it had been a surprise to have received the letter of invitation. Her piercing blue eyes peered down at the small figure, which was saying something since she was small herself, a petite young woman."}, "post-90473": {"user": "Gwyneth Sol", "user_num": 3174, "timestamp": "1558721929000", "message": "Gwyneth breathed a soft sigh of relief as well as a soft 'Thank you' when the great willow parted it's limbs for her and she finally stepped into the clearing of the festival. It was one of the few times she actually willing socialized with others, especially of her heritage. Generally, it was a good time and there was less contempt towards her in this way when all were in a good mood and less likely to notice her. But there were always years like this one where the nymphs caused a stir as she passed, even with her head down. But she was here now, and intended to make the best of her time- renewing her relations with some suppliers, meeting with some she could tentatively call acquaintances, and enjoying some good music. She lowered her cloak's hood carefully, the rounded points of her ears almost wiggling as they were exposed to the air for the first time in a while and the runes adorning her neck and cheeks shimmering a soft gold. She bit her lip as she saw Chesknight across the clearing and slowly made her way over. She always thanked the spirit for being nice enough to continue to extend his invitation to her year after year.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Gwyneth breathed a soft sigh of relief as well as a soft 'Thank you' when the great willow parted it's limbs for her and she finally stepped into the clearing of the festival. It was one of the few times she actually willing socialized with others, especially of her heritage. Generally, it was a good time and there was less contempt towards her in this way when all were in a good mood and less likely to notice her. But there were always years like this one where the nymphs caused a stir as she passed, even with her head down. "}, "post-90478": {"user": "Chesknight", "user_num": 2708, "timestamp": "1558722914000", "message": "\"The letter which I sent, arrived to those who needed them, or who deserved my respect and admiration. Your defense of the Usque is a noble cause, to be respected.\" he stared up with admiration at the enchanting being before him, giving a nod of respect. \"I am at your service, milady, and in return I only ask that you grace us tonight with your presence.\" His lofty words lost their ceremonial edge as a two fairies approached, tugging along a spilling pitcher between them. \"Drink, drink! This is no time to be so stoic, sir knight!\" they chimed in unison with small, tinkling voices easily heard above the din of partygoers. As if hearing this a tankard floated over as if of its own volition, and the fae clumsily poured it to spillage of the honey-liquid. Reaching out to grab the tankard's handle, equal parts with thanks and the apprehension that they might spill it on their guest if left to control it with their powers. The Chestknight had been about to add to his reply, when he quickly spied another approaching. \"Lady Sol!\" he exclaimed, pleased to see the woman who approached them. \"I am so very glad you took up my invitation! I feared this may not be the nature of event you would want to attend.\" Giving a respectful bow, he motioned to the newcomer. \"Lady Faisine, this is Lady Gwyneth Sol a kindred spirit to us I can say! Lady Sol, this is Lady Faisine, Guardian-regent of the Usque, gracing us with her presence after a long absence.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"The letter which I sent, arrived to those who needed them, or who deserved my respect and admiration. Your defense of the Usque is a noble cause, to be respected.\" he stared up with admiration at the enchanting being before him, giving a nod of respect. \"I am at your service, milady, and in return I only ask that you grace us tonight with your presence.\" His lofty words lost their ceremonial edge as a two fairies approached, tugging along a spilling pitcher between them. "}, "post-90480": {"user": "Yamato Sano", "user_num": 3428, "timestamp": "1558723452000", "message": "Yamato Slowly entered the path with every step the music and sound of joy became louder until the glamorous party was finally in eyes length, he rushed to the entrence of the party to watch the groupings of faes dancing and a few dancing on their own. Despite wanting to stand at the entrance and search for the chestknight, his shoulders bopped up and down simply from the view it was obvious he had no sense of rhythm yet could force himself to stop  \u201cwhat type of magic is this?\u201d  he thought to himself as he began to think back to Four days prior to today.Barely hours since he departed from Leon, Noel, and the SAQ section base of operations, he found himself alone yet with an uneasy sense to draw his blade, resting his individual hands on their respective sword grip which rested on his waist  \u201cany good swordsman can feel danger, only the great know when not to draw their swords.\u201d The words of his paternal grandfather whispered into his ears. He released the grip with his right hand and attempted to catch the invitation which pierced its way into his palm, the wound to his hand wasn\u2019t deep but the wound in his heart was.Yamato came back to his senses with his whole body doing a light shake, he rolled his eyes, turned around and began to slowly walk backwards to the table with the food, once he made it his body danced less and began to stuff his face with a few of the pears with orange flesh on them, the juiciness of the fruits he ate slowly made its way of the side of his lips and down to his chin.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Yamato Slowly entered the path with every step the music and sound of joy became louder until the glamorous party was finally in eyes length, he rushed to the entrence of the party to watch the groupings of faes dancing and a few dancing on their own. Despite wanting to stand at the entrance and search for the chestknight, his shoulders bopped up and down simply from the view it was obvious he had no sense of rhythm yet could force himself to stop "}, "post-90482": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1558724051000", "message": "She gave a nod, then said, \"I thank you for your invitation in any case.\" And then she was introduced to another and she gave the same, graceful bow that she had just given earlier. \"Good morrow,\" she said as she straightened her form, and tipped her staff a little in gesture. She wasn't going to be there long, she thought as she stood there, not smiling even as the fae seemed to be swarming about and trying to muster up good cheer from the merrymakers. It wasn't that she was sad or anything, but Faisine had not smiled since the end of the war, and maybe she had hardened some. She watched the fae flit about and almost wanted to start singing them all to sleep.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She gave a nod, then said, \"I thank you for your invitation in any case.\" And then she was introduced to another and she gave the same, graceful bow that she had just given earlier. \"Good morrow,\" she said as she straightened her form, and tipped her staff a little in gesture. She wasn't going to be there long, she thought as she stood there, not smiling even as the fae seemed to be swarming about and trying to muster up good cheer from the merrymakers. It wasn't that she was sad or anything, but Faisine had not smiled since the end of the war, and maybe she had hardened some. She watched the fae flit about and almost wanted to start singing them all to sleep."}, "post-90490": {"user": "Freya Haldar", "user_num": 3107, "timestamp": "1558731034000", "message": "A fox having come to Freya with the letter lodged in between its jaws Freya had taken it and read it. Fae of any kind were naturally present around Taingaard but the citizen and the fae lived normally miles and miles apart and would rarely see even the shadow of each other. Myth and tale told about both the fairies that brought luck and good omens and the more malign pixies which were aggressive and hostile towards anything they considered a threat. Which was basically anyone but themselves. Still this letter was seemingly not written by someone of ill intent and Freya would let the good omen of the fox carrying it to her be the proof that it was not some elaborate trap from a witch or dark fae. Her adventuring through the world was something her father - the tain - was not unfamiliar with and as such she was sure he would have no problems with her going away a few weeks. Getting to see this place and meet fae and fairies in person. Approaching the festival having finding the way by scent Freya was in the shape of a white panther. Before coming into contact with any fae or participants she morphed back into human form, her shape shifting leaving her slightly dizzy for a moment. Freya however let out a grin and strode towards the entryway to the festival's main area, and while eyeing a most odd and round fellow she stopped curiously and halfway bowed. \"Freya Haldar of Taingaard. I am an adventurer - of sorts...\" she explained her hands motioning in a skeptic way as a faint and soft smile appeared. \"Can I enter and join the celebrations?\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "A fox having come to Freya with the letter lodged in between its jaws Freya had taken it and read it. Fae of any kind were naturally present around Taingaard but the citizen and the fae lived normally miles and miles apart and would rarely see even the shadow of each other. Myth and tale told about both the fairies that brought luck and good omens and the more malign pixies which were aggressive and hostile towards anything they considered a threat. Which was basically anyone but themselves. "}, "post-90494": {"user": "Gwyneth Sol", "user_num": 3174, "timestamp": "1558736834000", "message": "Gwyneth jumped a bit at suddenly being addressed, startling so bad she nearly fumbled her staff. She gave him an embarrassed smile as she hurried over to him, a firmer grasp on her staff. \"T-Thank you for the invitation Chesknight. I do try to make an effort to attend the festival when I'm able... M-My annual socializing e-event and all.\" She said in her soft tone, very much like the whisper of autumn leaves agitated by the wind. It was almost impossible to hear over the celebration but somehow it still reached their ears clear as day. Holding her staff across her body, she gave a quick bow to the woman she'd been introduced to, avoiding her eyes again out of embarrassment. \"I-It is a pleasure to meet you Miss Faisine.\" She spoke again in her soft tones before she rose slowly, holding her staff in both hands. \"I.. I believe I've heard the trees whisper your name upon occasion. I-It is nice to put a name to the face.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Gwyneth jumped a bit at suddenly being addressed, startling so bad she nearly fumbled her staff. She gave him an embarrassed smile as she hurried over to him, a firmer grasp on her staff. \"T-Thank you for the invitation Chesknight. I do try to make an effort to attend the festival when I'm able... M-My annual socializing e-event and all.\" She said in her soft tone, very much like the whisper of autumn leaves agitated by the wind. It was almost impossible to hear over the celebration but somehow it still reached their ears clear as day. Holding her staff across her body, she gave a quick bow to the woman she'd been introduced to, avoiding her eyes again out of embarrassment. "}, "post-90503": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1558742886000", "message": "Her face registered surprise. Had the trees really spoken of her? The gentlewoman said in dulcet tones, \"I see... I... never would have guessed that my name was important enough to pass along. I am honored.\" And she meant it. She then gave a smile, one that brightened her face, for it was sweet and warm. \"Thank you. I shan't be long though, I cannot leave the Usque unattended, for it is growing back after a fire created by the Dragon Trogdor. I am trying to make sure the saplings have a chance to grow into mighty oaks one day so that the Usque legacy can live on stronger than ever.\"She glanced around to the other people and looked as if she would bolt, which wouldn't be surprising considering the things that she had seen in her short life.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Her face registered surprise. Had the trees really spoken of her? The gentlewoman said in dulcet tones, \"I see... I... never would have guessed that my name was important enough to pass along. I am honored.\" And she meant it. She then gave a smile, one that brightened her face, for it was sweet and warm. \"Thank you. I shan't be long though, I cannot leave the Usque unattended, for it is growing back after a fire created by the Dragon Trogdor. I am trying to make sure the saplings have a chance to grow into mighty oaks one day so that the Usque legacy can live on stronger than ever.\""}, "post-90505": {"user": "Gwyneth Sol", "user_num": 3174, "timestamp": "1558744965000", "message": "Gwyneth gave her own smile in return as she nodded and stepped back. \"I bid you a safe journey back and bless your mission well.\" She smiled before she turned to her hip, flipping open a holster and sifting through some vials. She took a few out, a keen eye evaluating them before she picked out one and shook it carefully. \"I-If you care to, take this. It will help them to establish their root systems and endure.\" She said as she tucked the rest away and lightly tapped the vial with her cane, making the green substance glow a soft teal now, swirling within the confines of the glass. \"Sprinkle it at their base when a rain shower is due and you will see the best results.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Gwyneth gave her own smile in return as she nodded and stepped back. \"I bid you a safe journey back and bless your mission well.\" She smiled before she turned to her hip, flipping open a holster and sifting through some vials. She took a few out, a keen eye evaluating them before she picked out one and shook it carefully. \"I-If you care to, take this. It will help them to establish their root systems and endure.\" She said as she tucked the rest away and lightly tapped the vial with her cane, making the green substance glow a soft teal now, swirling within the confines of the glass. \"Sprinkle it at their base when a rain shower is due and you will see the best results.\""}, "post-90506": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1558746332000", "message": "She took the vial and had a strange look on her face as she studied it. \"I shall try this. There is a lot of ground to cover, but this might help with a good sized bit.\" She had seen the devastation upon her arrival to the Usque, and she had wept for all of the char she had seen and monitored closely for new growth out of the ashes. She cleared her throat and said, \"I wish I could have been there to stop the dragon from ruining such history as he did. Leagues of forest, gone in one felt swoop. I wonder if someone managed to slay him.\" She looked up at the other woman and said, \"Thank you. This means a lot to the people of the Usque.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She took the vial and had a strange look on her face as she studied it. \"I shall try this. There is a lot of ground to cover, but this might help with a good sized bit.\" She had seen the devastation upon her arrival to the Usque, and she had wept for all of the char she had seen and monitored closely for new growth out of the ashes. She cleared her throat and said, \"I wish I could have been there to stop the dragon from ruining such history as he did. Leagues of forest, gone in one felt swoop. I wonder if someone managed to slay him.\" She looked up at the other woman and said, \"Thank you. This means a lot to the people of the Usque.\""}, "post-90508": {"user": "Chesknight", "user_num": 2708, "timestamp": "1558748790000", "message": "With his two guests suitably introduced, the Chesknight excused himself. He hoped that, like the trees of Usque, he could help the two women to work together and grow. For now, however, he had other guests to attend to. No sooner than he had left the side of Faisine and Gwenyth that he encountered another such guest. \"Ah, Lady Haldar!\" the knight exclaimed, approaching the druid with a bow. \"Please, do join us! I pray you tell me of what is transpiring in Taingaard for I have friends from there.\" he mentioned warmly. Another drink arrived, this one already filled, thankfully, with the sweet drink being passed around and hovered temptingly within reach of the woman. Indeed, the Knight did seem interested and as he straightened he gazed up with amber eyes. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "With his two guests suitably introduced, the Chesknight excused himself. He hoped that, like the trees of Usque, he could help the two women to work together and grow. For now, however, he had other guests to attend to. No sooner than he had left the side of Faisine and Gwenyth that he encountered another such guest. "}, "post-90518": {"user": "Gwyneth Sol", "user_num": 3174, "timestamp": "1558752261000", "message": "Gwyneth smiled back at the woman and nodded to her. \"Of course. I try to help where I can. And fear not, I assure you, it will go farther than you may think. Use it sparingly but if you need more or anything more, do not hesitate to whisper to the trees. It will no doubt reach my ear soon enough.  I am always listening.\" She relaxed then a bit, setting the base of her staff back into the ground. \"I wish I could help more like looking for the dragon, but I am no fighter or hunter. I do not know the extent of the damage to the wood but with any luck it can be remedied.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Gwyneth smiled back at the woman and nodded to her. \"Of course. I try to help where I can. And fear not, I assure you, it will go farther than you may think. Use it sparingly but if you need more or anything more, do not hesitate to whisper to the trees. It will no doubt reach my ear soon enough.  I am always listening.\" She relaxed then a bit, setting the base of her staff back into the ground. "}, "post-90526": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1558756791000", "message": "\"I don't think he lives... There were two dragons, Jark and Trogdor... Jark was involved with Goraia at some point, a traitor after helping me, and I am not sure of Trogdor except in that he destroyed hundreds of acres. The Usque will grow back, it isn't the first time it's been attacked and it won't be the last. The people of the Usque do what they can to safeguard it... You would be most welcome to visit one day of it is your wish to help.\" She smiled, relaxing as well. When the fae brought around drink, she took one and sipped at it.After a thoughtful pause, she asked, \"May I ask what it is you do? Are you a mage?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I don't think he lives... There were two dragons, Jark and Trogdor... Jark was involved with Goraia at some point, a traitor after helping me, and I am not sure of Trogdor except in that he destroyed hundreds of acres. The Usque will grow back, it isn't the first time it's been attacked and it won't be the last. The people of the Usque do what they can to safeguard it... You would be most welcome to visit one day of it is your wish to help.\" She smiled, relaxing as well. When the fae brought around drink, she took one and sipped at it."}, "post-90531": {"user": "Yamato Sano", "user_num": 3428, "timestamp": "1558790253000", "message": "Yamato finished stuffing his face with the repeated motion of his foot tapping against the ground, he searched around for a fae carrying drinks and swiftly gulped down one of them \u201cthank you!\u201d He spoke then made his way to advertisers his group; He stumbled upon two women, both seemingly young yet had a mature beauty. \u201cExcess me.\u201d He interrupted after one asked the other if she was a mage \u201cMy name is Yamato Sano of SAQ Sect, we are a mercenary group which wants to help other aquire true peace.\u201d He paused after giving faisine and gwyneth their mission statement \u201cIf there is ever a problem please reach out to us at Snowfall Castle, we assist with all kinds of issues.\u201d He smiled to both and waited for a response, if any.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Yamato finished stuffing his face with the repeated motion of his foot tapping against the ground, he searched around for a fae carrying drinks and swiftly gulped down one of them \u201cthank you!\u201d He spoke then made his way to advertisers his group; He stumbled upon two women, both seemingly young yet had a mature beauty. \u201cExcess me.\u201d He interrupted after one asked the other if she was a mage \u201cMy name is Yamato Sano of SAQ Sect, we are a mercenary group which wants to help other aquire true peace.\u201d He paused after giving faisine and gwyneth their mission statement \u201cIf there is ever a problem please reach out to us at Snowfall Castle, we assist with all kinds of issues.\u201d He smiled to both and waited for a response, if any."}, "post-90540": {"user": "Freya Haldar", "user_num": 3107, "timestamp": "1558810151000", "message": "It was a funny but merry little fellow that stood before her and he even claimed to have friends in Taingaard? With the Taingaardian people as adventurous as they were that sentiment didn't seem odd at all for Freya. \"Well met indeed!\" she said and smiled. \"Taingaard is seeing itself prosper in trade and culture so I cannot say that we are doing poorly. Also the yearly Hunt has just been settled with the winners being foreigners for the first time in many years!\" Freya explained enthusiastically already feeling the vibe in the compelling her to let loose and celebrate - for whatever reason.Something else was in the air though and soon she saw a floating glass approaching and after studying it for a brief moment like a paw dash she snatched it. Smelling it carefully she put her lips to the edge of the glass and sipped it.\"It's... honey-like and I certainly do trace a bit of alcohol here. It's quite nice!\" Freya said surprised being reminded of the mead the Taingaardians made back home - but those similarities were only superficial. \"What is this drink Mr. Knight?\" her brows furrowing with curiosity. Perhaps she could pry out a recipe to take back home?", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "It was a funny but merry little fellow that stood before her and he even claimed to have friends in Taingaard? With the Taingaardian people as adventurous as they were that sentiment didn't seem odd at all for Freya. "}, "post-90557": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1558832016000", "message": "\"I thank you for the kind offer,\" she said to the man who spoke to she and the other lass. She gave a gracious bow with a quiet dignity about her. \"Well met, Yamato Sano,\" she said whilst observing him. \"There is nothing to fight at this moment, no dragons to slay. But I will most certainly tell you if you are needed.\" She glanced toward the redhead and watched only briefly as she retrieved a drink. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I thank you for the kind offer,\" she said to the man who spoke to she and the other lass. She gave a gracious bow with a quiet dignity about her. \"Well met, Yamato Sano,\" she said whilst observing him. \"There is nothing to fight at this moment, no dragons to slay. But I will most certainly tell you if you are needed.\" She glanced toward the redhead and watched only briefly as she retrieved a drink. "}, "post-90574": {"user": "Yamato Sano", "user_num": 3428, "timestamp": "1558884253000", "message": "Yamato grabbed one of the drinks the fae were serving, took a sip \u201cDragons.\u201d He repeated softly to the group then gave a small smirk, he\u2019d only heard of such things from the golbins who lived as poor as he did, he assumed they were only stories they told to scare him. \u201cIt\u2019s rude of me not to ask someone as beautiful as yourself, what is your name, miss?\u201d He asked faisine, before putting the cup to his head and talking a chug of the drink, his foot lightly tapping against the floor. He waited for a response, before finishing off the last of his drink and resting the mug on a nearby table.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Yamato grabbed one of the drinks the fae were serving, took a sip \u201cDragons.\u201d He repeated softly to the group then gave a small smirk, he\u2019d only heard of such things from the golbins who lived as poor as he did, he assumed they were only stories they told to scare him. \u201cIt\u2019s rude of me not to ask someone as beautiful as yourself, what is your name, miss?\u201d He asked faisine, before putting the cup to his head and talking a chug of the drink, his foot lightly tapping against the floor. He waited for a response, before finishing off the last of his drink and resting the mug on a nearby table."}, "post-90585": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1558915139000", "message": "\"Faisine,\" she said, brows lifting at the man calling her beautiful in the manner of a flirt almost. Fai gave a smile and a bow the same as she had to others, and then she pocketed the vial. She sipped at her own drink and grimaced at the effects it had opposed to it's flavor, and she set her drink down. She then stepped away from the crowd of people because of unease, though not anyone's fault in particular. If someone chose to follow her, she would not really have anything to say at that moment. She seemed quite introverted, shy.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Faisine,\" she said, brows lifting at the man calling her beautiful in the manner of a flirt almost. Fai gave a smile and a bow the same as she had to others, and then she pocketed the vial. She sipped at her own drink and grimaced at the effects it had opposed to it's flavor, and she set her drink down. She then stepped away from the crowd of people because of unease, though not anyone's fault in particular. If someone chose to follow her, she would not really have anything to say at that moment. She seemed quite introverted, shy."}, "post-90587": {"user": "Yamato Sano", "user_num": 3428, "timestamp": "1558924165000", "message": "\u2018Faisine\u2019 it was both a rare and beautiful name, the smile and bow brought the thought of how many nobles greeted each other. The process of bowing when introducing oneself wasn\u2019t something he was quite accustomed to even when seeing so many people due it, he simply nodded as a reaction to her bow. He watched as she sipped on the drink then placed it down, her distasteful reaction made it obvious it wasn\u2019t exactly her cup of tea; his neutral faicial expression quickly went to a smile holding back a chuckle. When she walked away yamato followed her and stood beside her letting the music speak for them until he opened his mouth letting the words erupt from his fairly moist lips \u201cfaisine, is a lovely name.\u201d he spoke, his eyes peeked over the peak of his shoulder onto her.\u201c is it...\u201d the words began to leave his mouth but had stop when both of his lips fibally got together he couldn\u2019t exactly think of much to say, yet was still trying to find something to ask \u201care you a noble or at least work with them\u201d he questioned taking a shot at guessing of what she does.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u2018Faisine\u2019 it was both a rare and beautiful name, the smile and bow brought the thought of how many nobles greeted each other. The process of bowing when introducing oneself wasn\u2019t something he was quite accustomed to even when seeing so many people due it, he simply nodded as a reaction to her bow. He watched as she sipped on the drink then placed it down, her distasteful reaction made it obvious it wasn\u2019t exactly her cup of tea; his neutral faicial expression quickly went to a smile holding back a chuckle. When she walked away yamato followed her and stood beside her letting the music speak for them until he opened his mouth letting the words erupt from his fairly moist lips \u201cfaisine, is a lovely name.\u201d he spoke, his eyes peeked over the peak of his shoulder onto her."}, "post-90588": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1558925444000", "message": "\"I am a noble, yes...\" She glanced over to the one who had followed her. He might notice the stringed instrument strapped to the side of her rucksack, a fine instrument indeed which indicated her noble birth for certain. \"My father was a Duke before the great cataclysm. Technically I would be called a princess in some areas, though I am simply just Lady Faisine... As I said, by birth... But now? I highly doubt my title counts for anything anymore.\" She wasn't the least bit bitter sounding either, she had long since been at peace during her self imposed exile from people. \"Right now you may call me Guardian Regent of the Usque if it pleases you,\" she flipped her hand carelessly. Of course she cared about THAT title, but the rest just seemed like it was best left in the past.She turned and craned her head back to look up at him, clearly dwarfed by him.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I am a noble, yes...\" She glanced over to the one who had followed her. He might notice the stringed instrument strapped to the side of her rucksack, a fine instrument indeed which indicated her noble birth for certain. \"My father was a Duke before the great cataclysm. Technically I would be called a princess in some areas, though I am simply just Lady Faisine... As I said, by birth... But now? I highly doubt my title counts for anything anymore.\" She wasn't the least bit bitter sounding either, she had long since been at peace during her self imposed exile from people. \"Right now you may call me Guardian Regent of the Usque if it pleases you,\" she flipped her hand carelessly. Of course she cared about THAT title, but the rest just seemed like it was best left in the past."}, "post-90589": {"user": "Gwyneth Sol", "user_num": 3174, "timestamp": "1558929206000", "message": "Gwyneth, who had been about to answer Faisine's question about whether she was a mage, watched the exchange between the two, losing the ability to speak up or interject back into the conversation. She wasn't the most chatty after all and was just a bit prone to feeling out of place as a group grew larger. The tips of her ears turned red as she continued to listen to the exchange, fidgetting a bit with her staff. It took a good amount of effort not to pull up her hood to hide her face once again. She just took a drink from another passing fairy to preoccupy herself even as she toyed with her staff.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Gwyneth, who had been about to answer Faisine's question about whether she was a mage, watched the exchange between the two, losing the ability to speak up or interject back into the conversation. She wasn't the most chatty after all and was just a bit prone to feeling out of place as a group grew larger. The tips of her ears turned red as she continued to listen to the exchange, fidgetting a bit with her staff. It took a good amount of effort not to pull up her hood to hide her face once again. She just took a drink from another passing fairy to preoccupy herself even as she toyed with her staff."}, "post-90597": {"user": "Khepri", "user_num": 2653, "timestamp": "1558972183000", "message": "Shortly after the first few party-goers arrived, another flood decided to join. The most noticeable one was sitting on the shoulders of another, pleating little braids in his long hair. She was copper-skinned, dark hair that rolled down her back like a river, vast, black wings that stretched up into the air towards the sky, and a body dotted with golden feathers and scales that caught the sun and reflected it in every direction around her. Some would mistake her for a harpy, perhaps a fae, but she was nothing so simple, nor so beastly or mysterious, though she shared many traits with the fair folk of the summer court.With a toothy smile, she lifted herself up and pushed off of her friend's shoulders, looping through the air to greet the other guests. How exciting! She had never been to a party quite like this before, in another realm of all things. She circled for a while until she spotted two figures speaking to one another, one of which she could only guess was this... \"Chesknight.\"Swooping downward, she came to a slow halt beside them, hanging upside-down. With a smirk, she gave them a wink and a greeting.\"Good day to you both. I am Khepri, Bird of Paradise. I believe you must be Chesknight, am I correct?\" She then looked towards the taller guest, the one with hair like amber, with a thickness to her muscles that reminded her of someone that wasn't invited. \"And... who might you be?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Shortly after the first few party-goers arrived, another flood decided to join. The most noticeable one was sitting on the shoulders of another, pleating little braids in his long hair. She was copper-skinned, dark hair that rolled down her back like a river, vast, black wings that stretched up into the air towards the sky, and a body dotted with golden feathers and scales that caught the sun and reflected it in every direction around her. Some would mistake her for a harpy, perhaps a fae, but she was nothing so simple, nor so beastly or mysterious, though she shared many traits with the fair folk of the summer court."}, "post-90598": {"user": "Jochi", "user_num": 3206, "timestamp": "1558974502000", "message": "Abandoned by the gilded courtesan, the man with fine features and a myriad of braids in his hair laughed. At a glance it was apparent he was a man from the far east, though he didn't seem strictly from Tawakoshi or Quying. He wore the best clothing he could afford from his land, all of which included an incredibly colorful, bright blue deel lined with white, and fancy upturned boots that matched.Though every part of him looked human, there was an undeniable presence about him that wasn't. He wasn't fae either, nor a spirit or a creature, but wild magic clung and floated about him as naturally as it did everyone else at Midsomar. He paused shortly behind the Paradise Bird and also gave a bow to the Chesknight and Freya.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Abandoned by the gilded courtesan, the man with fine features and a myriad of braids in his hair laughed. At a glance it was apparent he was a man from the far east, though he didn't seem strictly from Tawakoshi or Quying. He wore the best clothing he could afford from his land, all of which included an incredibly colorful, bright blue deel lined with white, and fancy upturned boots that matched."}, "post-90599": {"user": "A Spirit Guardian", "user_num": 3043, "timestamp": "1558975773000", "message": "The third was a spirit, one who had traveled with the other two without stirring their notice. Unable to pierce the barrier between her realm and their own outside of her territory, she found them conjoin as she entered the festival.A strangeness washed over her, suddenly being able to be seen by so many people. One person, maybe two, every few months was all she was accustomed to, but here there were four, five, ten, thirty, more- so many more! All who could train their eyes directly in her position, no, at her. Though ages old, having drawn breath for many years before the cataclysm, she found herself stunned.This feeling melted away the further into the festival she walked in, easing her into a sense of enjoyment and comfort. She knew exactly what was coming over her, as she used the very same trick. She did not fight it, nor did she think she could, even with her magic. Many of the fae here were older than even herself, creatures conjured by nature, where she was born through the prayers of humans.Even here, the spirit's form was inconsistent. It flickered and flowed, and though her face and shape were mostly consistent, sometimes she could be seen with antlers, other times gills, then in another moment her skin was the same as tree bark, and in another, illuminating like the evening sky. Here and there, her hair was made of vines or adorned with flowers, perhaps short and striped with vibrant orange and black. She carried with her all the sights of the Kiyonai forest.She waited her turn behind her oblivious, but jovial traveling companions, though when the Chesknight was ready to receive her, she would give him a curtsy before she was on her way.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The third was a spirit, one who had traveled with the other two without stirring their notice. Unable to pierce the barrier between her realm and their own outside of her territory, she found them conjoin as she entered the festival."}, "post-90601": {"user": "Yamato Sano", "user_num": 3428, "timestamp": "1558976744000", "message": "\u201cAhh so you\u2019re technically a princess, that explains the beauty.\u201d He gave a short chuckle, after say such a thing. He listened carefully as she spoke to him \u201cwell, its not the worse upbringing my father was a blacksmith who tended to young new adventurer who couldn\u2019t quite afford to buy his weapon, my mother was a simple housewife, but i feel like my grandfathers were better off than their kids.\u201d He gave a slight pause and a sigh before continuing his story \u201cthey both were swordsmen who never meet each other until my mother was pregnant with me.\u201d He spoke looking over to her to watch her reaction.\u201cGuardian regent!\u201d He called out \u201chow is it that you were able to stumble upon such a title?\u201d He question slowly yet lightly leaning his shoulder onto hers.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cAhh so you\u2019re technically a princess, that explains the beauty.\u201d He gave a short chuckle, after say such a thing. He listened carefully as she spoke to him \u201cwell, its not the worse upbringing my father was a blacksmith who tended to young new adventurer who couldn\u2019t quite afford to buy his weapon, my mother was a simple housewife, but i feel like my grandfathers were better off than their kids.\u201d He gave a slight pause and a sigh before continuing his story \u201cthey both were swordsmen who never meet each other until my mother was pregnant with me.\u201d He spoke looking over to her to watch her reaction."}, "post-90604": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1558979751000", "message": "She gave him a sidelong look, \"Just because one is a princess, doesn't mean they are beautiful. Besides, there are beauties about that you ignore for plain old me. Look over at the young lady I was talking to. She's beautiful.\" Faisine turned her attention back to the music. \"I see,\" she said. She wasn't so sure on how to react to the man talking about his upbringing. Or was he just a young buck? He was quite talkative.\"It's my job,\" she said, \"to guard the Usque.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She gave him a sidelong look, \"Just because one is a princess, doesn't mean they are beautiful. Besides, there are beauties about that you ignore for plain old me. Look over at the young lady I was talking to. She's beautiful.\" Faisine turned her attention back to the music. \"I see,\" she said. She wasn't so sure on how to react to the man talking about his upbringing. Or was he just a young buck? He was quite talkative."}, "post-90629": {"user": "A Spirit Guardian", "user_num": 3043, "timestamp": "1559008578000", "message": "The spirit did not know much of human manners, which bode well for her here. She walked wherever her curiosity struck her, and curiosity led her toward the fair-haired lady and the lanky lad. Both were human, far as she could tell, though one had a little something else to her.Approaching, she didn't say much at first, feeling a mild tenseness in the air where such feelings were supposed to melt away. Looking between them with eyes like a waning moon, she smirked. If only the spirits of serendipity and misfortune were allowed to follow. They would have made a perfect in.\"I did not know humans could cross over into such a realm,\" she told them both. \"What an honor it must be. The summer fae are not anything if not welcoming. Have you two been here long?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The spirit did not know much of human manners, which bode well for her here. She walked wherever her curiosity struck her, and curiosity led her toward the fair-haired lady and the lanky lad. Both were human, far as she could tell, though one had a little something else to her."}, "post-90634": {"user": "Chesknight", "user_num": 2708, "timestamp": "1559009970000", "message": "The Chesknight was clearly enthused by the declaration Freya had for her homeland's property, and he raised his drink high (For him, at least) before pressing the edge of the cup to his helmet where lips should have been and, tilting his head back, drained it. There was no spillage, yet the drink was absent from the cup as surely as if it had been knocked back by a barbarian chief. In fact, one could almost have heard the tiny gulps...although it sounded peculiarly like the fae vocalizing the word \"Gulp\" in quiet tones. \"This was alcohol left as reserved for the Summer Court.\" he explained pleasantly. \"It was the dew of a flower, each the size of a man and would produce a keg a day! Unfortunately, the secrets were lost as the fog rolled over my former home.\" he added, although without the glum one might have expected. Hearing his title, however, the Fae turned, peering up at the lovely Khepri and her man-servant as they approached. \"I am indeed the Chesknight! I am thrilled you have come to join us, Lady Khepri, Bird of Paradise! I have heard many things about you. Some of them good!\" he added quickly, as if the addendum might make it seem less suspect. \"And this is Lady Haldar, of Taingaard!\"A number of fae danced and laughed, staring at Khepri and the others as they whispered secret thoughts into pointed ears and giggled, dancing away.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Chesknight was clearly enthused by the declaration Freya had for her homeland's property, and he raised his drink high (For him, at least) before pressing the edge of the cup to his helmet where lips should have been and, tilting his head back, drained it. There was no spillage, yet the drink was absent from the cup as surely as if it had been knocked back by a barbarian chief. In fact, one could almost have heard the tiny gulps...although it sounded peculiarly like the fae vocalizing the word \"Gulp\" in quiet tones. \"This was alcohol left as reserved for the Summer Court.\" he explained pleasantly. \"It was the dew of a flower, each the size of a man and would produce a keg a day! Unfortunately, the secrets were lost as the fog rolled over my former home.\" he added, although without the glum one might have expected. "}, "post-90636": {"user": "Rook", "user_num": 2900, "timestamp": "1559011917000", "message": "If there were anything in the world Rook was good at, it was finding the one person who didn't want to do something and making them do it anyways. In this case, as he danced and made merry, he caught sight of a meek little thing. Picking up a second cup of the honey-drink he approached Gwyneth, settling in next to her. \"You're far too beautiful to be here all alone!\" he exclaimed, offering her the cup. With a sly grin, his golden eyes sparkled with mischief. \"You're one of the Chesknight always invites, aren't you?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "If there were anything in the world Rook was good at, it was finding the one person who didn't want to do something and making them do it anyways. In this case, as he danced and made merry, he caught sight of a meek little thing. Picking up a second cup of the honey-drink he approached Gwyneth, settling in next to her. "}, "post-90641": {"user": "Gwyneth Sol", "user_num": 3174, "timestamp": "1559026894000", "message": "Gwyneth jumped slightly at suddenly being addressed having been trying to think of a way to politely and gracefully extricated herself from the conversation that had been hijacked. She turned to see the satyr there before the tips of her ears turned a brilliant scarlet from the compliment both from the woman she had been talking to and this new character. She really was no sight to look at. Her fae features did give her some elegance and grace, but the human blood served to curb the beauty sufficiently. Being as consumed in her work as she was as well, her appearance was also typically an after thought. She had thought to wash her hair and touch up her runes before coming, but that was all really. With no small amount of hesitation, she took the offered drink with a soft 'thank you' before nodding. \"Ah... yes. N-Not to the alone comment- I'm used to be a-alone- I am typically only with the forest as my company- But y-yes to the invite. Chesknight typically invites me. W-When I am not away collecting supplies... I... T-Try to be here.\" She said, fussing with her cane. Her eyes did flit around a bit landing upon the new arrivals and the other party goers before looking back at him, looking in his general direction. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Gwyneth jumped slightly at suddenly being addressed having been trying to think of a way to politely and gracefully extricated herself from the conversation that had been hijacked. She turned to see the satyr there before the tips of her ears turned a brilliant scarlet from the compliment both from the woman she had been talking to and this new character. She really was no sight to look at. Her fae features did give her some elegance and grace, but the human blood served to curb the beauty sufficiently. Being as consumed in her work as she was as well, her appearance was also typically an after thought. She had thought to wash her hair and touch up her runes before coming, but that was all really. "}, "post-90645": {"user": "Freya Haldar", "user_num": 3107, "timestamp": "1559034117000", "message": "Freya would finish her cup rather quickly the honeyed drink passing a lot easier than it perhaps should considering the amount of alcohol she felt already affecting her body, but it was not an uncomfortable dizziness but rather a gentle injection of... mirth. At least that was the best way she could describe it right now and the cautious expression turned to a slightly more amiable grin really quickly - especially aided by the comical Chesknight drinking his cup in that very amusing way. Covering her mouth with her hand in a much more lady like fashion than she was used to she chuckled and quite forgot that she was disappointed that she couldn't get the recipe. \"You're very... 'rotund' aren't you?\" she asked leaning slightly backwards her words also indicating the Chesknight's general mood and behavior matching his funny looks. \"This Summer Court is where you're from then? It sounds like a marvelous place!\" she then asked a bit more sincerely - but it wasn't long before another odd creature interjected herself into their conversation. \"And you're very... Upside down..!\" Freya carefully pointing her finger at Khepri trying to find fitting words for these people that weren't too insulting.\"Yes I am Freya Haldar of Taingaard.\" she chimed in. \"Where is... or what is... this 'paradise'?\" Freya asked curiously. It seemed tonight would be a night of a lot of new information and she was rather concerned she might not remember everything tomorrow - even if she had intended not to touch the beverage. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Freya would finish her cup rather quickly the honeyed drink passing a lot easier than it perhaps should considering the amount of alcohol she felt already affecting her body, but it was not an uncomfortable dizziness but rather a gentle injection of... mirth. At least that was the best way she could describe it right now and the cautious expression turned to a slightly more amiable grin really quickly - especially aided by the comical Chesknight drinking his cup in that very amusing way. Covering her mouth with her hand in a much more lady like fashion than she was used to she chuckled and quite forgot that she was disappointed that she couldn't get the recipe. "}, "post-90646": {"user": "Yamato Sano", "user_num": 3428, "timestamp": "1559043178000", "message": "He turned his head a bit give an questioning look before hearing the voice of another come not to long after \u201cyes, the summer fae are most welcoming of em all!\u201d He stated searching for a fae carring around the sweet alcohol so he could get yet another cup. \u201cI haven\u2019t been here for long\u201d he gave a short pause of silence before continuing \u201cif you ever need assistance with anything be sure to seek SAQ Sect, as we only work towards peace.\u201d He announced with a confident tone \u201cwith that i\u2019ll return in a few!\u201d He lied walking to a fae grabbing another cup of alcohol then moving to the table with the many fruit, from there he glanced towards the corner he once stood in then looked away.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He turned his head a bit give an questioning look before hearing the voice of another come not to long after \u201cyes, the summer fae are most welcoming of em all!\u201d He stated searching for a fae carring around the sweet alcohol so he could get yet another cup. \u201cI haven\u2019t been here for long\u201d he gave a short pause of silence before continuing \u201cif you ever need assistance with anything be sure to seek SAQ Sect, as we only work towards peace.\u201d He announced with a confident tone \u201cwith that i\u2019ll return in a few!\u201d He lied walking to a fae grabbing another cup of alcohol then moving to the table with the many fruit, from there he glanced towards the corner he once stood in then looked away."}, "post-90648": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1559052682000", "message": "She watched as the boy left, amusement dancing in her eyes. She turned to the fae, \"I ought to thank you for that.\" She grimaced a little and sighed as she looked back to the source of music. \"I am only here for music.\" She did not indicate whether she was playing or staying where she was at. \"Not long at all, and I am not merely just a human.\" That was said vaguely before she curled her finger over her mouth.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She watched as the boy left, amusement dancing in her eyes. She turned to the fae, \"I ought to thank you for that.\" She grimaced a little and sighed as she looked back to the source of music. \"I am only here for music.\" She did not indicate whether she was playing or staying where she was at. \"Not long at all, and I am not merely just a human.\" That was said vaguely before she curled her finger over her mouth."}, "post-90666": {"user": "Rook", "user_num": 2900, "timestamp": "1559080058000", "message": "She was nervous, he could tell. Yet, that only served to spur him onwards, why not take the opportunity to bring her out of herself a bit? \"But parties aren't really something you seek out, are they?\" he asked conversationally. \"You show up, but why? Do you feel as if you owe the Chesknight something?\" the question was innocent enough, of course, his eyes flickering across what small portions of her face were visible. Someone such as her was a beacon to the satyr. People who didn't want to be seen were always a treat. Taking a swig from the stein he held, he wiped his mouth with the back of his hand, stepping forward as he extended the other. \"Care to dance?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She was nervous, he could tell. Yet, that only served to spur him onwards, why not take the opportunity to bring her out of herself a bit? "}, "post-90673": {"user": "Foxgloves", "user_num": 3423, "timestamp": "1559085479000", "message": "Foxgloves whipped the blanket off of Lady Genevieve St. James and her childrens' heads, and they would find themselves standing in a very different place than they had been moments before. The sky was brighter, the trees didn't loom so imposingly, and even the air smelled sweeter. All around them, humans and fae danced and frolicked and imbibed in all manner of liquors and candies. Foxgloves gestured with a sweep of the hand for the trio to go explore the festival, stuffing the blanket back into his pocket with the other hand.\"Here we are, Ms. St. James,\" he said. \"Welcome to the Midsomar Festival. I do hope you enjoy it, and that your children have a good time here. Fae are known for putting on excellent festivals. They're also known for kidnapping infants and stealing teeth from the mouths of innocent children, but I'm not sure how true those ones are. Regardless, everyone seems quite friendly here, so I'm sure that the only threat to your teeth are those sweets.\"He chuckled, gazing over at the tables full of refreshments. If only he could taste them, or even bite into them and feel the texture...but he had always lacked the luxury of sensation, and hadn't yet been able to figure out a way to acquire it for himself.\"I'll be around,\" he continued. \"Once you get tired, or you decide you've had enough, come find me and I'll take you right back. Free of charge.\"", "link_list": ["/user/875"], "image_list": [], "html": "Foxgloves whipped the blanket off of "}, "post-90674": {"user": "A Spirit Guardian", "user_num": 3043, "timestamp": "1559087031000", "message": "The tiniest smile made its way to the spirit\u2019s face as the boy scrambled away, watching him briefly until he found a corner. She then gave the woman her full attention. \u201cGladly received,\u201d she answered.Scanning her face, the spirit nodded. \u201cI surmised. A glance was all I needed to realize it. Unfortunately, I am ignorant to this festival\u2019s nature and that of many of those here. Perhaps you could teach me what I am missing, starting with your name.\u201dBriefly, she gave the woman before her a bow. \u201cI do not go by any one. Feel free to name me at will.\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The tiniest smile made its way to the spirit\u2019s face as the boy scrambled away, watching him briefly until he found a corner. She then gave the woman her full attention. \u201cGladly received,\u201d she answered."}, "post-90675": {"user": "Khepri", "user_num": 2653, "timestamp": "1559087119000", "message": "\u201cAll of them have been good, Chesknight, because everything bad was recieved with mirth,\u201d she added with a tiny chuckle. Though she took a moment to glance around, taking time to notice the fingers pointing her way, she only raised her eyebrows and smiled in response, otherwise training her attention on the guests in front of her. \u201c- and now I\u2019m very right side up. Is that how you prefer it?\u201d she asked teasingly to the druid woman. \u201cA pleasure to meet you, Lady Haldar- rather, how about I just call you Freya?\u201dTo answer her question, Khepri bit her lip in thought. \u201cWell, I could say it\u2019s a little bit like here. My home in the sky, that is. The jungle below is much less forgiving. I wouldn\u2019t visit if I were you, especially since any reason to go there is right in front of you.\u201d A joyful laugh followed.\u201cAnd ah, Taingaard. I have been there. My team won the Great Hunt-\u201d She lifted her hand to display the gorgeous ring that appeared black until the light hit it, where it would sheen like pure silver. \u201cWe got these gorgeous rings for it. I do say, I enjoyed my stay there. A wonderful country, if a little cold.\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cAll of them have been good, Chesknight, because everything bad was recieved with mirth,\u201d she added with a tiny chuckle. "}, "post-90676": {"user": "Jochi", "user_num": 3206, "timestamp": "1559087149000", "message": "Before he was able to greet the Chesknight, Jochi caught sight of a scene that could only be written in comedy. Mischief in his eyes, he wandered off, winding his way through the fae, gracefully accepting one of the beverages offered, and landing himself next to the dejected boy in the corner.\u201cI\u2019ve never seen anyone kick a puppy, but I imagine that\u2019s what you look like,\u201d he snickered, hiding his mouth behind his cup of wine. \u201cWould you like some sage advice or some encouraging company? I\u2019m rather good at both, I admit.\u201dA hand was offered to the lad with green hair. \u201cI am Jochi. And you?\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Before he was able to greet the Chesknight, Jochi caught sight of a scene that could only be written in comedy. Mischief in his eyes, he wandered off, winding his way through the fae, gracefully accepting one of the beverages offered, and landing himself next to the dejected boy in the corner."}, "post-90681": {"user": "Alden Marshal", "user_num": 794, "timestamp": "1559090135000", "message": "There was a storm gathering on the horizon. Not for those at the Midsomar Festival, but rather for one of its attendees.A carriage rolls up to the gathering and it is practically full to the brim. Seven children and two adults who had just spent a considerable amount of time trying to keep the children from going utterly stir crazy. Even children as well behaved as those of The High Marshal of Isra could become terrors when cooped up for so long.When they finally arrived at the fairy circle, the doors practically explode open and excited squeals can be heard as six cat eared children and one silent little human girl all but fly out of the carriage. They are ready to bolt into the crowd but the firm voice of their father catches them before they can get separated. The hard eyes of The High Marshal of Isra sweep over the gathering. For many, his face was an expressionless mask, remote and unreadable. But as he looks from his children to the woman at his size the corner of his eyes softens. However, they may be able to tell that there was some unknown tension weighing heavily on his shoulders beyond that of the duties he carried. Still, that was a worry he hoped to forget for the day. When his children learned of the festival they'd insisted that the family go and though Alden hadn't felt quite comfortable having his kids outside the safety of Isra learning of the potent magic that prevented violence in the fairy circle had persuaded him to allow it. \"Alright what do you want to do first?\"He asks the kids all of whom shout out different answers. There were so many things to do at the festival and each of them had an idea of what would be the most fun. However, one small voice with a lisp made a suggestion that caught like wildfire. \"Candy Appwes.\" And soon the children are chanting it in chorus. \"Alright, let us see if we can find you some candy apples.\"Their father says with an indulgent smile. The sheer excitement that the children had at the possibility of getting their favorite treat was infectious enough to make him forget his worries. He just hoped that it was something that could be purchased at the festival, if it wasn't he wasn't quite sure what he would do to balm such dissapointment. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "There was a storm gathering on the horizon. Not for those at the Midsomar Festival, but rather for one of its attendees."}, "post-90682": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1559091811000", "message": "She knew she turned heads even as she did not turn hers... Her lack of interest was telling, and Faisine was not someone who showed that kind of interest to just anybody. A man named Dantess was the only one who she had ever wanted that kind of thing from and she had no clue whether he still lived or if the end of the war had taken him too; she'd only been a child about the same age as the boy when she had met the man in question. He was the one an only she hurt for, and even then? It never made it beyond the thought of a kiss. And the boy? Well, he would be alright. When the time was right, he would find someone to woo and their head would eventually turn his way. He was still young.Fai looked at the unnamed one and tilted her head whilst she listened. There was something earthy and feral about the blond, a dignity about her that was princess like in only good ways. \u201cI haven\u2019t been around people in three years, m\u2019lady Nemo. I know nothing about this festival\u2026 I have never attended before. I am Faisine, guardian regent of the Usque\u2026\u201d At that, she took in a deep breath, let it out, and then continued, \u201cWhat is it you wish to know? If I can answer you, I will.\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She knew she turned heads even as she did not turn hers... Her lack of interest was telling, and Faisine was not someone who showed that kind of interest to just anybody. A man named Dantess was the only one who she had ever wanted that kind of thing from and she had no clue whether he still lived or if the end of the war had taken him too; she'd only been a child about the same age as the boy when she had met the man in question. He was the one an only she hurt for, and even then? It never made it beyond the thought of a kiss. And the boy? Well, he would be alright. When the time was right, he would find someone to woo and their head would eventually turn his way. He was still young."}, "post-90683": {"user": "Lady Genevieve St. James", "user_num": 875, "timestamp": "1559094154000", "message": "The blanket was pulled from their heads and the children -- if one could call them children, considering Voltaire was easily taller than Genevieve -- were immediately awed by the goings-on of the festival.The golden-haired Lady St. James, of course, was far more reserved, although her smile was a little brighter.\"Oh, Maman, please, please, I want to see what that is,\" Gabrielle begged, the human girl with the red curls bouncing on her toes as she pointed in some fantastic direction.\"If Voltaire goes with you,\" Genevieve said.The kids raced off, leaving Genevieve with Foxgloves. She smiled at him, her smile just a touch sadder than it had been before.\"Thank you, Foxgloves. I'm sure you'll find us when it's time,\" the lady spoke, her voice smooth and accented and prepared to be alone for a while.When Foxgloves was gone, the beautifully dressed woman glanced around the meadow and took in the sights. She could smell the magic in the air, the sweetness of it. She wondered if she should let her hair down from it's twist, but thought better of it.Instead, Genevieve began to stroll, her gown trailing slightly behind her, the sunlight catching the honey of her hair and the gleam of the subtle jewelry she wore around her neck.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The blanket was pulled from their heads and the children -- if one could call them children, considering Voltaire was easily taller than Genevieve -- were immediately awed by the goings-on of the festival."}, "post-90692": {"user": "Gwyneth Sol", "user_num": 3174, "timestamp": "1559105280000", "message": "Gwyneth blinked at the slew of questions, quickly overwhelmed. That was the trouble with her minimal conversational skills. Chatty folk like the satyr before her inevitably managed to talk rapid circles around her. It took her a few moments to piece together everything he had said before formulating a response that was at least somewhat coherent.\"I-I don't owe Chesknight anything... And n-no I do not typically seek out these events. But... I do try to make it to at least one. Partly to show I... I am still around and also f-for... things like supplies and techniques... t-those I can learn from others.\" She said carefully, fiddling with the cup of honey drink she'd been given. \"...I also... do not dance. I never learned... it was never really a skill that I needed to have on hand so... I didn't. So... I may step on some toes... Or...\" She glanced back down at their feet, her runes flaring slightly in embarrassment. \"...H-Hooves rather.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Gwyneth blinked at the slew of questions, quickly overwhelmed. That was the trouble with her minimal conversational skills. Chatty folk like the satyr before her inevitably managed to talk rapid circles around her. It took her a few moments to piece together everything he had said before formulating a response that was at least somewhat coherent."}, "post-90701": {"user": "Chesknight", "user_num": 2708, "timestamp": "1559148272000", "message": "At the \"rotund\" comment the Chesknight chuckled good-naturedly, patting his stomach before turning to face Khepri as she righted herself. As she revealed that she had completed the Hunt, displaying the shimmering ring, a certain change came over the partygoers in the immediate vicinity. The fae that buzzed around seemed to slow, observing her more closely. Smiles that had once been the grins of cheering revelers suddenly felt entirely-too-much like sharks circling their prey. \"Congratulations!\" The Chesknight declared and yet despite his feigned enthusiasm is rang somewhat hollow. \"Perhaps, however, it would be best to keep that to yourself for today.\" he added pointedly, although with more concern than anger. With a glance at the surrounding fae they broke off, resuming their merriment as if nothing in the world had occurred. He could keep her safe here, he knew. None of them would try and break the rites of the festival, they couldn't even truly consider that possibility, as ingrained as it was. That didn't mean the Bird of Paradise would be safe among his people in the future but here she had nothing to worry about. Indeed, only those most in-tune with nature would have realized the faux pas at all. As the new guests flooded in, and children ran about the festival, a number of fairies hovered nearby, some as small as bumblebees following after cat-eared children like sparks in the wake of a meteor. There was an underlying temptation in place. A desire that many fae couldn't fight. How easy would it be for a parent to lose one of so many children in a crowd, never to find it again? Or to find something else very much like the lost one? Yet, they knew the rules. Not the traditional rules of course. Before the Chesknight throwing these little shindigs the rules on these sorts of things were more lax. The knight insisted, however, that children were under his personal protection and few fae wanted to bother with something *that* difficult. Instead they fluttered around the cat-eared babes, hearing their desires and leading them to a platter stacked high with candied apples that, any earlier observer might have noted were absent before their arrival.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "At the \"rotund\" comment the Chesknight chuckled good-naturedly, patting his stomach before turning to face Khepri as she righted herself. As she revealed that she had completed the Hunt, displaying the shimmering ring, a certain change came over the partygoers in the immediate vicinity. The fae that buzzed around seemed to slow, observing her more closely. Smiles that had once been the grins of cheering revelers suddenly felt entirely-too-much like sharks circling their prey. "}, "post-90705": {"user": "Freya Haldar", "user_num": 3107, "timestamp": "1559151654000", "message": "Freya followed the turning of Khepri with her eyes as if she was performing some circus act - it seemed that even the small things were being amplified by either the drink or the magic that added cheerfulness to the air. \"Well that you certainly are!\" Freya said and chuckled fairly amused. That lady really seemed to be in the right mood. \"I think in the spirit of the celebrations just 'Freya' will suffice.\" she answered wondering if she hadn't seen her before somewhere. The chuckle went to laughter as the bird's terrible self boasting entertained Freya. \"Well then, which of the best qualities do you take with you from Paradise then?\" she inquired already expecting an entertaining answer. \"Have you..?!?\" Freya said surprised, although as she said it Freya did remember that Khepri was a part of the group of people who won. \"Ahh yes you met with my father!\" she said and gazed at the very special ring that proved it to be true. \"Yes, it does get chilly around there, but then again it is advisable to follow custom and wear clothes.\" Freya winked remembering that Khepri had been known to dress as nature intended while she stayed there. However suddenly it seemed like the festivities decelerated quite rapidly and everyone's eyes were fixed on Khepri. Freya's smile turned to a frown as she remembered that the 'monster' they caught had actually been a fairy of sorts - a fairy who had assaulted a grown man and left him poisoned and unconscious. This however was hardly the time for discussing such touchy topics of crime and punishment lest she wanted to be dragged into it - and she didn't. \"Perhaps... we should proceed inside the ring and find another cup of this very delicious drink?\" Freya suggested with a fake smile whispering out of the corner of the mouth as she led Khepri along with a hand on her shoulder. \"You didn't do anything stupid like grinding it to fairy dust, did you..?\" Freya snarled. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Freya followed the turning of Khepri with her eyes as if she was performing some circus act - it seemed that even the small things were being amplified by either the drink or the magic that added cheerfulness to the air. "}, "post-90715": {"user": "Aya Prinn", "user_num": 2160, "timestamp": "1559176681000", "message": "Her father was a quirky old Baron whose children were grown. Her older brother would one day take his place, her sister would be happily married to a man of higher status, and she, Amaya, the bookish one, would probably happily become a spinster if it meant she could make her own choices. Of course, her father did not like this idea and ended up acquiescing to her wishes. Of course, Amaya had no illusions of grandeur when choosing to set off on her own destiny; she knew that she would have to make her own money to do with as she pleased and tuck away her small allowance for a nest egg.She'd been traveling for some time now, finding odd jobs along the way but never really finding a place where she fit. She was holding out for being the perfect companion to a higher ranking aristocrat, perhaps become a governess at the very least. There was a small part of her through all of that, that daydreamed of being found by a man and asked to watch the children he'd had with his late wife, and she would show him how good she was at nurturing... but that was just the young one talking to her.It was through her journey that she received a letter to a festival that sounded so very fanciful that she could not help but to be intrigued by it all. The young miss had wonder filled eyes and ruddy cheeks from good cheer. She lifted on her toes, bounced once on them every few moments, her eyes trying to drink in the sight before her.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Her father was a quirky old Baron whose children were grown. Her older brother would one day take his place, her sister would be happily married to a man of higher status, and she, Amaya, the bookish one, would probably happily become a spinster if it meant she could make her own choices. Of course, her father did not like this idea and ended up acquiescing to her wishes. Of course, Amaya had no illusions of grandeur when choosing to set off on her own destiny; she knew that she would have to make her own money to do with as she pleased and tuck away her small allowance for a nest egg."}, "post-90716": {"user": "Foxgloves", "user_num": 3423, "timestamp": "1559178253000", "message": "Foxgloves watched as the children vanished into the crowd, then turned his attention back to Genevieve.\"I'm sure I will, Ms. St. James. Do enjoy the festival and try to relax. It's good for you. I'll see you around.\"He wandered off, moseying through the crowd and watching the various revelers as they danced and laughed. They certainly seemed like they were having fun, and part of him wanted to join them. However, he had work to do. After all, so many people gathering around almost certainly meant that there were customers to be found. His work never ended, and that was how he liked it. Idleness didn't suit him, after all.\u00a0As he strolled through the crowd, his gaze fell on a young woman just arriving to the festival. She had that look about her, the look of someone who was looking for something. That was his favorite kind of person. Oftentimes, people who were looking for something didn't know exactly what they were looking for, and Foxgloves was always more than happy to convince them that his wares were what they'd been searching for this entire time. Reaching into his pocket, he pulled out an enormous sunflower before approaching the woman and tapping her on the shoulder with a long, pointy finger.\"Hello,\" he said. \"You look to be in search of something. Perhaps I could help, Miss Prinn?\"He offered her the sunflower, its yellow pedals shining brightly in the sunlight.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Foxgloves watched as the children vanished into the crowd, then turned his attention back to Genevieve."}, "post-90717": {"user": "Aya Prinn", "user_num": 2160, "timestamp": "1559179494000", "message": "She looked toward the source of a sudden voice and the owner of the flower in her face, startled. Her mouth dropped open a little and she squinted at him in confusion. \"Um... Yes? Perhaps?\" She then looked around and discovered that the people who'd had her attention had moved elsewhere. \"I don't even know why I am here. Someone sent me a letter to come here and I am not sure why. But it looks like some fun, so why not stay for a minute?\" She frowned then and turned toward the male, taking the sunflower stem in her hand. It was a bit too large to put behind her ear like she would a wildflower.\"Who are you?\" she asked, \"And thank you for the flower, it's quite lovely.\" How did he know her name but she did not know his? Had she met the man before in one of the many counties she had visited in her travels? He did not look familiar... Or maybe he was the person who sent the invitation, she thought. Was that it?", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She looked toward the source of a sudden voice and the owner of the flower in her face, startled. Her mouth dropped open a little and she squinted at him in confusion. \"Um... Yes? Perhaps?\" She then looked around and discovered that the people who'd had her attention had moved elsewhere. \"I don't even know why I am here. Someone sent me a letter to come here and I am not sure why. But it looks like some fun, so why not stay for a minute?\" She frowned then and turned toward the male, taking the sunflower stem in her hand. It was a bit too large to put behind her ear like she would a wildflower."}, "post-90718": {"user": "Foxgloves", "user_num": 3423, "timestamp": "1559180410000", "message": "Foxgloves nodded, the points of his hood flopping as he did so. So he'd been right, then. He was usually right, but it was still nice when his suppositions were validated.\"A letter,\" he said. \"How novel. Certainly a very direct sort of invitation, don't you think? I'd have imagined people to have been brought here by more subtle means. A missed turn, a lost horse, a light in the woods...the sort of things that lead people to simply show up believe it to be chance. A letter definitely means that someone wanted you here, and I'm sure there must have been a reason behind that. Maybe the reasons will become apparent, maybe not. Who knows, with fae?\"Had everyone received written invitations, he wondered? He'd simply heard about the festival through the grapevine, as it were. Whispers and rumors picked up along his travels, scraps of truth woven into elaborate tales full of egregious falsehoods. Perhaps that had been his invitation.\"As for me,\" he continued, \"I'm Foxgloves. I sell things. All manner of things. If you are in fact looking for something, I'm certain that I can provide it for a very reasonable price. It's what I do, after all.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Foxgloves nodded, the points of his hood flopping as he did so. So he'd been right, then. He was usually right, but it was still nice when his suppositions were validated."}, "post-90719": {"user": "Aya Prinn", "user_num": 2160, "timestamp": "1559181811000", "message": "\"Aye, a letter.\" She nodded firmly, pulled it out and presented it. \"It was quite the surprise, I can assure you. I am a mere human, why would they have wanted to invite me?\" Then she gave a shrug. Her hands folded in front of her as she listened to his query about what she was looking for. She frowned... What was she looking for? Certainly nothing that was sold for any price.\"I don't seek anything but a place in the world. I have been looking for a place to settle, work, and perhaps even writing.\" She released her hands and patted her upper thighs through her silks, tilting her head back to study a cloud or two like the dreamer she was. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Aye, a letter.\" She nodded firmly, pulled it out and presented it. \"It was quite the surprise, I can assure you. I am a mere human, why would they have wanted to invite me?\" Then she gave a shrug. Her hands folded in front of her as she listened to his query about what she was looking for. She frowned... What was she looking for? Certainly nothing that was sold for any price."}, "post-90721": {"user": "Foxgloves", "user_num": 3423, "timestamp": "1559193783000", "message": "\"The inner workings of a fae's mind are a mystery to folks such as us,\" said Foxgloves. \"Perhaps they wanted to kidnap you, or steal your youth. Maybe they got you confused with someone else, or decided that they'd like to trick you into signing away your future children. Perhaps they simply thought your presence would brighten up the event. That's certainly a possibility, especially if you walk around with that sunflower.\"The sunflower in question seemed to glow, and one could almost feel warmth radiating from its face. It certainly was a very nice flower indeed, if a bit inconvenient to carry around. Foxgloves followed her gaze up to the clouds, watching them with Amaya for a moment before continuing.\"I do enjoy clouds. That one looks like a duck, don't you think? Still, I don't think you'll find a place for yourself up there. A person's place is down here on the ground...until it isn't. What if there was a place up there for you, in the clouds? What if I told you that you could get there, and all it took was a hop, a skip, and a jump? Or perhaps a two-step and a shuffle. Do you know how to dance, Miss Prinn?\"He reached into the pocket of his coat, his arm vanishing all the way to the elbow as he rummaged. After a moment of searching, he pulled out a pair of ruby-red boots that almost certainly should not have been able to fit in a coat pocket and offered them to Amaya.\"Try these on,\" he said. \"I'll let you test them out, to see if you want to buy them. I found them in an old wardrobe in the middle of a mushroom forest, can you believe that? They look like they've been chewed on by rats. Anyways, put them on. We'll dance, and you'll see exactly how useful these boots can be.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"The inner workings of a fae's mind are a mystery to folks such as us,\" said Foxgloves. \"Perhaps they wanted to kidnap you, or steal your youth. Maybe they got you confused with someone else, or decided that they'd like to trick you into signing away your future children. Perhaps they simply thought your presence would brighten up the event. That's certainly a possibility, especially if you walk around with that sunflower.\""}, "post-90726": {"user": "Aya Prinn", "user_num": 2160, "timestamp": "1559228678000", "message": "\"Perhaps,\" she said with a certain curiosity. Her eyes moved from him to the crowd and back again, though she did not say more on that particular topic. There wasn't much to be said, a festival was supposed to be busy and loud and fun. She noticed the sunflower and gave a strange look, starting to wonder if Foxgloves was just messing with her with some strange shenanigans.\"What on earth are you talking about? I look up because I like to, not because I seek what's up there.\" What a peculiar person, she thought and frowned. \"I do know how to dance,\" she said in reply. She watched him reach into his coat and pull out some gnarly looking shoes. She stared as he told her to take them, \"Ummm, they look too big for my feet,\" she said honestly, her feet were rather dainty. \"I am not looking to buy anything though, I even said so. I need work, the girl I was a companion to married almost a year ago and I need to find another.\" But never, she thought, would she find herself marrying, would she now? Aya cleared her throat and shook her head, \"I don't wish to buy the shoes.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Perhaps,\" she said with a certain curiosity. Her eyes moved from him to the crowd and back again, though she did not say more on that particular topic. There wasn't much to be said, a festival was supposed to be busy and loud and fun. She noticed the sunflower and gave a strange look, starting to wonder if Foxgloves was just messing with her with some strange shenanigans."}, "post-90732": {"user": "Foxgloves", "user_num": 3423, "timestamp": "1559242726000", "message": "The points of Foxgloves' hood drooped as she declined the shoes. Why were people so quick to judge things on their appearance? So eager to dismiss something just because it'd been chewed on by rats? Surely they didn't look that bad. He held them up to the light, holding them carefully to cover the most threadbare parts with his hands.\"I don't think you understand,\" he said. \"They really are quite remarkable, and seem to fit just about anybody. Look, I'll demonstrate. Come, you'll see.\"He slid his feet, pointy shoes and all, into the boots. Despite his shoes seeming far longer than the boots, they appeared to fit without an issue. Lacing them up with a complicated triple-bow, he straightened up and held out his hand to Amaya.\"Dance with me,\" he said. \"Just one song, and you'll see exactly how remarkable these boots are. I'm sure it'll at least sway your decision a little bit. Perhaps they'll even help you find a new companion, one that isn't married this time.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The points of Foxgloves' hood drooped as she declined the shoes. Why were people so quick to judge things on their appearance? So eager to dismiss something just because it'd been chewed on by rats? Surely they didn't look that bad. He held them up to the light, holding them carefully to cover the most threadbare parts with his hands."}, "post-90734": {"user": "Aya Prinn", "user_num": 2160, "timestamp": "1559246397000", "message": "She watched dubiously as he demonstrated the shoes, clearly unimpressed by the pair and not really interested. Oh, magic shoes. Still not interested. He asked her to dance and she shook her head, \"Oh, no, I couldn't...\" And then her eyes widened at his implication of a married man in her life, her jaw dropping at the offense. \"I... beg... your... Pardon??? I have never in my life been interested in, nor shown interest from any married man in my entire life! Man who isn't married, indeed. Hah.\"She folded her arms and lifted her chin whilst turning her head and giving an indignant little harrumph. \"I am not looking for shoes, nor am I looking for a husband. I am looking for a home, employment, life. I don't see how... rat... chewed... magic shoes have any relevance whatsoever in my situation!\" She was sputtering, and about to walk away. But there was on thing bugging her, \"And how do you know my name? Hmm?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She watched dubiously as he demonstrated the shoes, clearly unimpressed by the pair and not really interested. Oh, magic shoes. Still not interested. He asked her to dance and she shook her head, \"Oh, no, I couldn't...\" And then her eyes widened at his implication of a married man in her life, her jaw dropping at the offense. \"I... beg... your... Pardon??? I have never in my life been interested in, nor shown interest from any married man in my entire life! Man who isn't married, indeed. Hah.\""}, "post-90735": {"user": "Foxgloves", "user_num": 3423, "timestamp": "1559247833000", "message": "Foxgloves' hood points drooped even lower at her indignation. People were so fickle, he never really understood what they were going to do next. Hadn't she just said that her previous companion had gotten married, and that was why she was looking for a new one? Maybe he'd misunderstood her. In any case, it was clear that she had no interest in the boots. Her loss.\"That's not what I meant,\" he said, \"and these boots can help you find all of those things. You could live anywhere you pleased, and who wouldn't hire someone with these boots? Goodness, I might just keep them for myself. As for your name...well, I'm good with names. I know lots of people's names. People say them all the time, and I hear all sorts of things. It's remarkable what you'll hear if you listen instead of talk, you know. Everyone's always telling someone something, and you'd be surprised at what one can pick up. You should try it, Miss Prinn.\"In the background, the music picked up to a more lively tune. Glancing back, Foxgloves clicked his heels together and began dancing a rather frenetic jig.\"Perhaps a dance would do you good, Miss Prinn. Help you relax. It's important to relax, you know. Your hair will go grey if you're all worked up all the time. You'll get wrinkles, and it's awfully hard to smooth out wrinkles.\"As he danced, his steps suddenly began to pick him up off the ground. He hopped, twisted, and twirled his way up above Amaya, as though he were dancing his way up an invisible staircase.\"Are you sure you don't want to give these boots a try?\" he asked. \"They're very comfortable. It's like I'm dancing on air.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Foxgloves' hood points drooped even lower at her indignation. People were so fickle, he never really understood what they were going to do next. Hadn't she just said that her previous companion had gotten married, and that was why she was looking for a new one? Maybe he'd misunderstood her. In any case, it was clear that she had no interest in the boots. Her loss."}, "post-90737": {"user": "Aya Prinn", "user_num": 2160, "timestamp": "1559248938000", "message": "\"My companion was a young lady who I chaperoned and kept out of trouble until she married. You made it sound like I am some... floozy. I'm not, you know?\" And then she stopped talking to stare at the man as he started dancing like some fool. If there cameras were a thing in that timeline, she would have looked into it in one of those wtf sort of looks. With a sigh, she looked toward the place where she came in, contemplating leaving. He made it seem like she was something that she wasn't and it also depressed her a little. She was not the type to be depressed, she was a cheerful sort of gal. But the fact she may or may not have overreacted wasn't lost on her.Why did he think she needed the boots, too? She peered up once again and then looked away. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"My companion was a young lady who I chaperoned and kept out of trouble until she married. You made it sound like I am some... floozy. I'm not, you know?\" And then she stopped talking to stare at the man as he started dancing like some fool. If there cameras were a thing in that timeline, she would have looked into it in one of those wtf sort of looks. With a sigh, she looked toward the place where she came in, contemplating leaving. He made it seem like she was something that she wasn't and it also depressed her a little. She was not the type to be depressed, she was a cheerful sort of gal. But the fact she may or may not have overreacted wasn't lost on her."}, "post-90738": {"user": "Foxgloves", "user_num": 3423, "timestamp": "1559252399000", "message": "Foxgloves noticed that Amaya didn't seem particularly interested in the boots, and stopped dancing. Standing upside-down on the air, he lowered himself down until he was face-to-face with Amaya, the points of his hood hanging straight down. She seemed to be lost in thought, which was unfortunate. People lost in thought rarely bought things.\"You don't seem impressed,\" he said. \"You young people are so hard to impress nowadays. Did you see a lot of magic boots, while you were working as a chaperone? I can't imagine you did, if you kept her out of trouble. Magic boots often come with trouble, which is why it's so convenient to buy them trouble-free from someone like me. I guess you're not interested in boots, though.\"He dropped to the ground, contorting his body to land lightly on his feet without so much as a thump. Pulling the boots off, he dropped them into his pocket.\"I'm afraid that I don't sell homes, or lives, or employment. That'd be a bit difficult to fit in my pockets, don't you think? I'd need a new coat, and I'm rather attached to this one. Perhaps I can interest you in something else?\"Rummaging in his pockets once more, he pulled out a small orange kitten, which meowed softly in his hands. He held the kitten out to Amaya, and it batted at her with its paws.\"I don't know where these kittens come from,\" he said. \"I think some strays must have snuck into my pockets one day, and never left.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Foxgloves noticed that Amaya didn't seem particularly interested in the boots, and stopped dancing. Standing upside-down on the air, he lowered himself down until he was face-to-face with Amaya, the points of his hood hanging straight down. She seemed to be lost in thought, which was unfortunate. People lost in thought rarely bought things."}, "post-90739": {"user": "Aya Prinn", "user_num": 2160, "timestamp": "1559256672000", "message": "\"I am not familiar with magic boots. I've only read about them...\" she sounded morose at the moment. \"Maybe I got the invitation by accident,\" she thought out loud, \"Maybe I should...\" She was about to say move on when he pulled out an adorable little kitten. She was butter. She took the kitten and nuzzled her face into it's fur and said, \"Oh, I wish I could have you.\" But how would she take care of the kitten if she had no home? She showered the little thing with kisses and soon began to pet.\"I don't have a home,\" she reminded him, even though he said he didn't have one to sell. \"I need a home so I can take care of a kitten. But that won't happen any time soon.\" She reluctantly handed it over.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I am not familiar with magic boots. I've only read about them...\" she sounded morose at the moment. \"Maybe I got the invitation by accident,\" she thought out loud, \"Maybe I should...\" She was about to say move on when he pulled out an adorable little kitten. She was butter. She took the kitten and nuzzled her face into it's fur and said, \"Oh, I wish I could have you.\" But how would she take care of the kitten if she had no home? She showered the little thing with kisses and soon began to pet."}, "post-90740": {"user": "Foxgloves", "user_num": 3423, "timestamp": "1559257462000", "message": "The kitten seemed pleased with the attention, purring in response to Amaya's kisses and pets. When she handed it back, it meowed, biting Foxgloves' fingertip as he tried to pat it himself. Ignoring the bite, he put the kitten back into his pocket, shaking his head.\"Such a shame,\" he said. \"I think he liked you, too. I'm sure you'll find a home soon, Miss Prinn. Home is what you make it, after all. A home doesn't have to mean a house. I'm sure you'd find my home quite curious indeed. Here, I have it with me somewhere.\"Reaching into yet another pocket of his coat, he pulled out a worn piece of paper. As he held it out to Amaya, she would see that it had a very crude picture of a small cottage painted on it. With its bright colors, rough edges, and dubiously straight lines, it was clear that it had been painted by either a very young child or someone very unfamiliar with paints. A similarly amateurish tree stood beside the house, bright red apples hanging from its green blob of leaves. The only notable thing about the house was the fact that its roof peaked up in two points, rather than just one.\"This is where I live,\" said Foxgloves. \"I carry it with me everywhere, so that I'm never too far from home. Would you like to visit? It's quite nice. The apples are very sweet, and always in season. Plenty of room for cats, although I try not to keep pets.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The kitten seemed pleased with the attention, purring in response to Amaya's kisses and pets. When she handed it back, it meowed, biting Foxgloves' fingertip as he tried to pat it himself. Ignoring the bite, he put the kitten back into his pocket, shaking his head."}, "post-90741": {"user": "Aya Prinn", "user_num": 2160, "timestamp": "1559259778000", "message": "She eyed him when he took the kitten back and handled it wrong without meaning harm, she stopped him from putting it back by taking the little thing back into her arms and cuddling. \"He doesn't like that, he likes being cuddled,\" she said, then said to the kitten, \"No, you don't like being cooped up, do you kitty?\" What was it about girls and kittens? He pulled out a picture of a house and she looked at it. Without realizing it, she was so focused on the picture that it was snatched from his fingers without her moving and it moved closer to her face.Her fingers were too busy petting kitten for her to notice her telekinesis, something she hid since childhood to the point where she actually forgot she had such a skill. And even the telepathy followed with her projecting her interpretation of his house, surrounded by wildflowers of every color and shape.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She eyed him when he took the kitten back and handled it wrong without meaning harm, she stopped him from putting it back by taking the little thing back into her arms and cuddling. \"He doesn't like that, he likes being cuddled,\" she said, then said to the kitten, \"No, you don't like being cooped up, do you kitty?\" What was it about girls and kittens? He pulled out a picture of a house and she looked at it. Without realizing it, she was so focused on the picture that it was snatched from his fingers without her moving and it moved closer to her face."}, "post-90747": {"user": "Foxgloves", "user_num": 3423, "timestamp": "1559266474000", "message": "Foxgloves allowed Amaya to snatch the kitten back out of his hands, nodding as she cuddled the little creature. Perhaps he'd get a sale today yet. The kitten seemed to enjoy the treatment, purring and snuggling up against Amaya's hands. As the painting was pulled from his hands, the points of his hood rose until they were standing straight up, pointing to the sky and towering over Amaya. This was a surprising development, as was the sudden image in his head that certainly did not come from his thoughts.\"Well now,\" he said, \"There something that I'm sure would help you find a job. Imagine if you worked as a shopkeeper, you'd be able to put everything back on their shelves without having to lift a finger. How convenient.\"As Amaya focused on the painting, it would suddenly start to move. Wind blew through the poorly-drawn tree, grey smudges of smoke began to float up from the chimney, and a childishly-drawn version of Foxgloves poked his head out through the window.\u00a0\"Come along, Miss Prinn,\" said the drawn Foxgloves. \"Lean in, come visit. The kitten will love it, I've got a bowl of milk.\"If she looked up, she would see that the real Foxgloves had vanished without a trace.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Foxgloves allowed Amaya to snatch the kitten back out of his hands, nodding as she cuddled the little creature. Perhaps he'd get a sale today yet. The kitten seemed to enjoy the treatment, purring and snuggling up against Amaya's hands. As the painting was pulled from his hands, the points of his hood rose until they were standing straight up, pointing to the sky and towering over Amaya. This was a surprising development, as was the sudden image in his head that certainly did not come from his thoughts."}, "post-90763": {"user": "Kauri Graves", "user_num": 2656, "timestamp": "1559319967000", "message": "Kauri was extremely unsure about this. Especially about bringing the children. After all, she had been kidnapped by fairies as a child. She knew their kind. This was dangerous.Well, it was going to be amazingly fun. But so dangerous.Even as they entered the festival and a sense of giddiness and enjoyment washed over Kauri, something that was all too familiar, a voice spoke in the back of her head to be wary. It was her sister's voice, who was the only person she knew who could go toe-to-toe with a fae even though she had no magic of her own and never once wielded a sword. Back then, the only reason Kauri was in the overworld was that her sister kidnapped her back. For this reason, she did not bring Poala, her daughter. She looked so much like her. They would have hated it.But now she had seven other children here to look after, which was going to drive her mad. Still, her concerns eased the more time they spent there by the second. As the children ran off, Kauri hooked her hand onto Alden's arm. \"What a lovely idea this was,\" she told him, even though she had said the exact opposite an hour previous. \"Allow us to mingle with some of the company while the children play. I can't imagine much will happen to them here.\"Smiling, Kauri steadied herself with Alden's weight. Her legs were human now, which was a rather strange thing to get used to after walking on hooves for two years. After so long being mutated by Paradise, she was completely back to her old self once more.Kauri didn't completely love it. She had gone in for a trim and received a shave instead. Another trip to the Enclave would happen, but for now... for now, this was nice.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kauri was extremely unsure about this. Especially about bringing the children. After all, she had been kidnapped by fairies as a child. She knew their kind. This was dangerous."}, "post-90767": {"user": "A Spirit Guardian", "user_num": 3043, "timestamp": "1559321332000", "message": "Nemo. Another lovely name to add to the lot.\"I am familiar with such isolation,\" she told Faisine, attempting to connect with her. \"It is rare that I can even be seen by those in the mortal realm. This is quite the exception. I am glad to have the chance to meet such fine company.\"What words for a spirit of the wild! She was thankful for the shrine her new devotee built in the city. It helped her observe and learn how people and their manners had changed over the last few years. \"Then teach me about your home. You do not dress like those from my homeland- no one here does. This Usque, I have never heard of it.\"She was intrigued by this woman's mannerisms, so delicate but not shy. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Nemo. Another lovely name to add to the lot."}, "post-90768": {"user": "Khepri", "user_num": 2653, "timestamp": "1559322257000", "message": "Khepri felt it immediately.The air chilled. It made her look up and around, exchanging glares with the eyes pinned on her. Her feathers rustled. She had an uncanny sense of what happened, just not why. She ignored the rest of Freya's question and focused, instead, on her last one while she took Chesknight's advice.\"... I did no such thing. I was not even there when she was caught,\" she told them. \"I saved a woman from falling off a cliff and for that I was awarded. That was all. If anything happened to her-\" Her eyes aimed downward toward the stocky fae. \"I apologize. I thought she was going to be released.\"The Bird slipped the ring from her finger and tucked it away among her feathers. \"I will accompany you, Freya. But let us leave talk of Taingaard for... another time. Another place.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Khepri felt it immediately."}, "post-90771": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1559323055000", "message": "Faisine bowed slightly and then murmured, \"The Usque is an expansive forest North of where a place called Medan once ruled. The people of the Usque are not quite human, they are like nymphs, in fact... Its a beautiful place to be, mostly untouched by mankind in quite some time, but confusing to most. It would be easier for you to see it than for me to tell you.\" And she was honest, how did one explain an enchanted forest that was ancient and half gone thanks to dragon breath?", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Faisine bowed slightly and then murmured, \"The Usque is an expansive forest North of where a place called Medan once ruled. The people of the Usque are not quite human, they are like nymphs, in fact... Its a beautiful place to be, mostly untouched by mankind in quite some time, but confusing to most. It would be easier for you to see it than for me to tell you.\" And she was honest, how did one explain an enchanted forest that was ancient and half gone thanks to dragon breath?"}, "post-90801": {"user": "Lady Genevieve St. James", "user_num": 875, "timestamp": "1559335702000", "message": "As the enchantress with the golden hair and beautiful traveling gown walked the lands, her lilac gaze traveled over the bodies that were there. Some were human, some were decidedly not, and most were new to her experience... Except a face that stood out from the crowd, perhaps because of a gaggle of cat-like children that surrounded him.A soft and warm smile touched her lips as she watched the six kits swarm off to get something sweet to the indulgence of their father, and curiosity shined in her gaze when she saw a young, beautiful woman on the Marshal's arm.Using one hand to lift her skirts, she used the other to raise in greeting, letting her accented voice carry over the distance.\"Marshal!\" She called, just loud enough for her to be heard. The Lady Genevieve wouldn't ever cause a public scene. She waved as she came closer, the sun gleaming off her hair, shining off the material of her masterly made gown. \"It has been a long time,\" she said, her Gauldish accent smooth on her voice. She held her hand out first to Alden, and then to Kauri. \"Bonjour,\" she said in greeting. \"My name is Genevieve St. James.\" No titles, at least, not for her.[(Jon-vee-ev, NOT jen-a-veev)]", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As the enchantress with the golden hair and beautiful traveling gown walked the lands, her lilac gaze traveled over the bodies that were there. Some were human, some were decidedly not, and most were new to her experience... Except a face that stood out from the crowd, perhaps because of a gaggle of cat-like children that surrounded him."}, "post-90806": {"user": "Alden Marshal", "user_num": 794, "timestamp": "1559348381000", "message": "Alden had understood and appreciated Kauri's concern and respected her decision not to bring Poala. While he was fairly certain that the girl would be quite disappointed to miss out on what was sure to be a magical evening, it was not his place to question Kauri's decisions. Even if he could guarantee the girl's safety. The fairies were wise to heed The Chesknight's warning this night. While there was no doubt that the master of ceremonies was the reason they held back, they could not have known how dire things may have gotten for them should they have acted on their impulse. While a normal man may not notice a single missing or replaced child Alden was, by all accounting, not a normal man. Indeed, his rune scarred eyes surveyed the crowd and the riot of colors was almost an overload to his senses. It was only thanks to years of both training and adjustment that he was not overwhelmed as his enchantments stripped away glamours and revealed a kaleidoscope of underlaying enchantments for him to pick apart. Kaur leaned against him for support and while he was providing physical support for her, she was unknowingly providing her own kind of support for him. He found that focusing on her, now that she was bereft of magic, helped to sooth the strain his eyes were going through in the magical festival. While he could have ignored it, the option for a reprieve was greatly appreciated. \"I think you are right, though I will keep an eye on them.\"No sooner was an accord reached for the two adults to mingle as the cat-eared children played with the dancing fairy lights than someone called him out by title. Lifting his head it only took him a moment to locate the waving form emerging from the crowd. A small smile, warm and genuine crinkles the corners of his eyes, a more real expression than Genevieve may remember seeing on Alden's face in the past.Accepting her hand he says in his smooth nearly accentless tenor voice. \"A pleasure to see you again Genevieve.\" And indeed it was. Miss St. James had been one of the first people to ever show him real kindness and he held that memory dearly. The boots she'd given him on that day all those years ago still adorned his feet, well cared for though clearly well worn at this point. \"Genevieve, this is Kauri Greaves, I am at present courting her.\" He introduces Kauri as he understands this to be polite and then he continues addressing Kauri. \"Genevieve operates a clothing shop in Isra from time to time. She made my boots for me and showed me kindness when I was still... adjusting to a life I was new to.\" It was at this point the cat-eared children notice Genevieve and with a cry, six small bodies swarm in at once. \"Hello!\" \"I remember you from the fair!\" \"Her name is Genevieve!\" \"It's nice to meet you again!\" Many small voices announce their excitement, his children as ever eminently enthused to meet a person be they new or old to them. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Alden had understood and appreciated Kauri's concern and respected her decision not to bring Poala. While he was fairly certain that the girl would be quite disappointed to miss out on what was sure to be a magical evening, it was not his place to question Kauri's decisions. Even if he could guarantee the girl's safety. "}, "post-90826": {"user": "Kauri Graves", "user_num": 2656, "timestamp": "1559363755000", "message": "Kauri lifted her head and looked about as she heard Alden's surname. Eventually, her eyes pinned down onto a rather enchanting figure approaching them. The woman's eyes grew large as she gave her a once-over. Something in her chest fluttered upon seeing her, then ached emptily once she realized who she really was. A sense of being very dowdy and insignificant swarmed the survivor of Paradise, especially knowing that Alden could actually see her now. Here she was, next to this rare, golden belle wearing finely-woven clothes, as a dowdy little mouse in a green kirtle and chemise that were just a tad too big for her.Still, she did her best not to show it on her face. She grasped her hand and gave it a gentle squeeze, giving her a warm smile. She couldn't help the pink that rose to her cheeks when Alden mentioned his courting of her, biting her lips to stop an embarrassed laugh.\"A pleasure, Miss Genevieve,\" she greeted her. \"It's always been nice to meet one of Alden's friends. He really knows how to keep good company. Who are the little ones?\"So much. She was so much like Colette already. Kauri had to avert her gaze to the side just so she wasn't staring.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kauri lifted her head and looked about as she heard Alden's surname. Eventually, her eyes pinned down onto a rather enchanting figure approaching them. The woman's eyes grew large as she gave her a once-over. Something in her chest fluttered upon seeing her, then ached emptily once she realized who she really was. A sense of being very dowdy and insignificant swarmed the survivor of Paradise, especially knowing that Alden could actually "}, "post-90829": {"user": "Lady Genevieve St. James", "user_num": 875, "timestamp": "1559368701000", "message": "She'd forgotten all about the boots, and in a flash she realized that Alden must have met Odette those years ago as well. And memories of her ten year old daughter, of course, made Genevieve's heart sieze in her chest. For a moment, a very brief moment, her lavender eyes stared at Alden's familiar face, full lips parting as the Fae Festival seemed to melt away. Did he know about Odette? Perhaps he didn't. Perhaps it wouldn't be too awkward when Genevieve's own children -- Gabrielle and Voltaire -- inevitably came to greet them. Perhaps.And in the next moment, she snapped out of it and instead turned to regard the pretty young woman at Alden's side. Genevieve's smile to her was soft but warm -- it seemed that most of the blonde enchantress's emotions were only always subtle at best, and the woman herself was always very kind, and very, very controlled.\"It is a pleasure to meet you, Madamoiselle,\" Genevieve said with a small flourish of her Gauldish accent. \"That color is very beautiful on you.\"She might have said more, but she found her skirts swarmed by the children, that had grown so much since last she saw them. She had smiles and greetings for them as well, until she heard a shout over the little bit of chaos.\"Maman!\" Gabrielle came over, twelve years old and already a beauty like her mother -- her real mother, the lost Queen of Gauldin -- with tumbling red curls and blue eyes. Behind her was Voltaire, tall like his father -- the lost King of Gauldin -- with his dark hair and piercing eyes... And guarded attitude.\"Marshal,\" Genevieve said, her heart pounding but acting as nonchalant as usual, \"may I introduce my daughter, Gabrielle, and my son, Voltaire? This is Marshal Alden Marshall of Isra, Miss Kauri Greaves, and the Marshal's children.\"\"How do you do?\" Asked Gabrielle, her Gauldish accent a little thicker than Genevieve's. Voltaire only nodded his greeting, and neither of the children offered their hands. Tucked in Gabrielle's elbow was the \"living\" doll that Foxgloves had given her, and the doll was animatedly looking at everyone and listening to the conversation as well.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She'd forgotten all about the boots, and in a flash she realized that Alden must have met Odette those years ago as well. "}, "post-90861": {"user": "Alden Marshal", "user_num": 794, "timestamp": "1559435687000", "message": "Alden was certainly getting better about parsing out other people's emotional states but he was not yet an expert. If it did not pertain to an impending desire to do violence he could often miss subtle things. Things like Kauri's insecurity when faced with the golden-haired beauty of Genevieve. Likewise, he easily missed the understated worry in Genevieve's at the realization that he had met Odette.Today though, despite missing both these things, he'd give neither women cause to worry. Alden only had eyes for Kauri and through either tact or foreknowledge, he did not mention the absentee daughter. Instead, his rune scarred eyes turn on the two children. \"A pleasure to meet you both my apologies for what is about to happen.\" He says and an amused smirk draws across his features. The two children were a bit older than Alden's litter and they were clearly quite a bit more serious. Neither of these things was in any way a deterrent to the excited movement of the children. They did not go so far as to swamp the two but Voltaire and Gabrielle found themselves surrounded and outnumbered by cat eared children who were thrilled to make their acquaintance. \"I'm Caleb!\" \"I'm Kae!\" Shout the two brown-haired boys who looked so similar they were really the only true pair of twins in the group. The two both extending their hands to Voltaire. Clearly very impressed by his height as they look up at them their tails swaying excitedly. \"I am Juniper.\" Says one of the blue-haired girl. \"I like your doll she adds.\" As she offers Gabrielle her hand. \"I'm Moonflower!\" Chimes in the other blue-haired girl. \"And that's Rawr-rawr.\" She adds hooking a thumb at a quiet blue-haired boy who was clutching a large dragon plushie.\" The brown haired girl says in slow Gauldish to Grabrielle. \"Bonjour, je m'appelle Naoki.\" Then she beams, she'd only just started learning her second language this year and she was eager to practice with a native. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Alden was certainly getting better about parsing out other people's emotional states but he was not yet an expert. If it did not pertain to an impending desire to do violence he could often miss subtle things. Things like Kauri's insecurity when faced with the golden-haired beauty of Genevieve. Likewise, he easily missed the understated worry in Genevieve's at the realization that he had met Odette."}, "post-90878": {"user": "A Spirit Guardian", "user_num": 3043, "timestamp": "1559492985000", "message": "A curious smile spread across the spirit's face. \"Then I certainly will have to visit one day. I will have my followers travel there, in time. Tawakoshi is far to the east, but there have been talks of travel. Whispers of the Usque will fill their dreams when I return.\"Expanding her territory outside of country borders... the idea was quite preposterous, but she could make it work. The world outside her forest was already fascinating, and there was much to do here.\"I am not one for ample talk. Perhaps you would like to dance?\" she asked, holding a hand out towards the woman.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "A curious smile spread across the spirit's face. \"Then I certainly will have to visit one day. I will have my followers travel there, in time. Tawakoshi is far to the east, but there have been talks of travel. Whispers of the Usque will fill their dreams when I return.\""}, "post-90879": {"user": "Kauri Graves", "user_num": 2656, "timestamp": "1559494084000", "message": "Kauri's cheeks pinked once more at the compliment, though she took it as politeness. Even so, it was nice.Before she could give a compliment in return, the children were upon her. She couldn't help but giggle behind her hand as she witnessed the pack of children overwhelm someone every single time.When introduced to Genevieve's children, she gave them a soft smile. Alden's litter was upon them before even she could push a word through once more. \"They're beautiful,\" she told Genevieve. \"What is that doll that your daughter is holding, though? It's... em... looking around. Is it enchanted?\"She couldn't say that she had a particular liking for it.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kauri's cheeks pinked once more at the compliment, though she took it as politeness. Even so, it was nice."}, "post-90883": {"user": "Lady Genevieve St. James", "user_num": 875, "timestamp": "1559500190000", "message": "The children -- cat-eared or no -- quickly entertained themselves. Gabrielle was quicker to warm up to Alden's children than Voltaire was. Perhaps it was due to her gentler nature, or perhaps it was because Voltaire was, indeed, much older than the rest and was still dedicated to appearing guarded but also detached, in ways that only a true adolescent could accomplish.Outside the boisterous circle of children, Genevieve stood with Kauri and Alden, and took her enchanting gaze off of them to smile at Kauri -- a gentle and soft thing that never seemed to show Genevieve's teeth, and always seemed to communicate some very, very subtle melancholy.Still, the once-seamstress was warm and approachable, and seemed genuine in her friendly regard for the High Marshal and his lady.\"Thank you,\" she said to Kauri. \"I am quite proud of them.\" Her head tilted a little as she looked at Gabrielle's doll -- whom she was showing to the girl-children.\"It is a new acquisition. A peddler by the name of Foxgloves gave it to her, and brought us to this festival. We were on our way back to Isra, to reopen my doors.\"She paused, and then spoke. \"I'll admit the doll has me hesitant. It's not charmed in a way I can easily recognize...\"She let her voice trail off, and then looked from Alden to Kauri. \"How has the acclimation gone with the children?\" As in, how are they in regarding Kauri has a potential mother?", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The children -- cat-eared or no -- quickly entertained themselves. Gabrielle was quicker to warm up to Alden's children than Voltaire was. Perhaps it was due to her gentler nature, or perhaps it was because Voltaire was, indeed, much older than the rest and was still dedicated to appearing guarded but also detached, in ways that only a true adolescent could accomplish."}, "post-90899": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1559537418000", "message": "\"I don't dance,\" she said, \"They don't teach that in convents.\" She smiled at the question nevertheless, \"It is kind of you to ask though.\" She didn't like being among so many, it was starting to make her nervous to be there. She said, \"Be careful sending people to the Usque. You can get lost easily in that forest. I shall be back there soon and I will be waiting for just one of your people. She can be cruel and dengerous... The Usque, that is, if they have any ill intent.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I don't dance,\" she said, \"They don't teach that in convents.\" She smiled at the question nevertheless, \"It is kind of you to ask though.\" She didn't like being among so many, it was starting to make her nervous to be there. She said, \"Be careful sending people to the Usque. You can get lost easily in that forest. I shall be back there soon and I will be waiting for just one of your people. She can be cruel and dengerous... The Usque, that is, if they have any ill intent.\""}, "post-90905": {"user": "Freya Haldar", "user_num": 3107, "timestamp": "1559571086000", "message": "The joyful half bird and half woman suddenly seemed to change her mood quite drastically and while they went into the circle she wondered exactly what had happened in Taingaard in The Hunt and how such information had been able to travel from there and to the fae that lived here. \"Ummm... well okay if you say so.\" Freya said and bit confused but willing to leave the subject for some other time - if there would ever be a better time for it. \"Can I have two..!\" Freya asked on of the fae that was flying about with the cups and almost before she got to finish the question there was already a fae ready with drinks. \"Wow, even Vanskaar Meadhall don't bring you a drink this quickly!\" Freya said and handed Khepri one of the drinks. \"You seem like you could use it...\" she said with a wry smile taking a sip of the soft and sweet tasting drink. \"You shouldn't think too much about that, as you said it wasn't you and they likely wouldn't have invited you then - because they sure do seem to know a lot of what's been going on.\" Freya rubbed her chin. \"How did you get your invitation by the way?\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The joyful half bird and half woman suddenly seemed to change her mood quite drastically and while they went into the circle she wondered exactly what had happened in Taingaard in The Hunt and how such information had been able to travel from there and to the fae that lived here. "}, "post-90906": {"user": "Alden Marshal", "user_num": 794, "timestamp": "1559573588000", "message": "The children were in no way put off by Voltaire's aloofness. Indeed, once the doll had been shown off it was decided that the next, logical step, was to start a game of tag. A game of tag that Voltaire was part of whether he liked it or not it seemed. Since the children were quick to tag him into the game and even should he refuse to give chase the children were more than happy to bounce into him lightly to keep the game going.For whatever reason, they'd decided to take his guardedness as a challenge. Determined to make the older boy smile and play with them, unless Voltaire snapped at the kids they would persist until he did so. They happily ran around the glade always insight of their parent as they chased fairies, each other, and sometimes random guests without a care in the world. Alden had noted the doll as well, that it was magical he could tell, beyond that he was in the dark as much as Genevieve. He could recognize many common enchantments by sight but the workings on the doll were not common. After all, animation magic was not as widely used as, say, warding or trap magic.Genevieve's question is left unanswered by the marshal. He could tell it had been directed at Kauri and he would let her answer as she saw fit. However, in a rare moment of insight, he did squeeze her hand gently as the children run around. The kids seemed to adore her but they were quick to lavish affection on anyone, so he had no idea what insecurities she might harbor. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The children were in no way put off by Voltaire's aloofness. Indeed, once the doll had been shown off it was decided that the next, logical step, was to start a game of tag. A game of tag that Voltaire was part of whether he liked it or not it seemed. Since the children were quick to tag him into the game and even should he refuse to give chase the children were more than happy to bounce into him lightly to keep the game going."}, "post-90963": {"user": "Nilanwe", "user_num": 3452, "timestamp": "1559670335000", "message": "Elanwe was nothing if not eager to joining the celebrations of her fellow fae. As small as a candle she danced and sang with the clouds of fae that hovered above the partygoers. It was amazing to think, she had considered earlier in the day, that one of the humans that had been invited could look up, see that cloud and know each little fae had experiences that likely outstripped their respective lifetimes by a multiple of hundreds. Of course, that had been the sober thoughts of Midday Elanwe. Now, with the drink filling her belly with fire, and the intoxicating atmosphere she was feeling quite playful despite the time of day. Soon, however, the conversations of fae grew dull. The worst part about these parties was that, if you knew each other for centuries you had time to hear *all* of one-another's stories. But for the update of the past year she had heard everything these little rascals had to say and now they were taking turns listing off their funniest or most satisfying experiences of their lives. Bo-ring.Yet down below the humans milled about, talking to one-another in light, awe-inspired tones. They were much more interesting, she was sure. How they managed to fit in such stories into their short lives was impossible for her to know yet either by her will, or her compromised judgement she found herself desperately wanting to be a part of one. After all, a dalliance of a century could at times be fun. Gazing around her limpid blue eyes tried to select one of the humans. The two women talking? No, she recognized the feathered one. Someone had already mentioned seeing her later. The masked one could be interesting, but she decided that he simply knew too much to actually be fun. No, it was more fun to lure in the ignorant. That thought, of course, made her consider the Marshall. You couldn't get more ignorant than that, she decided. Yet, as she turned her gaze in that direction she spotted a younger boy. He was cute, in his own way. Trying very hard to build a barrier in people's perceptions between the young children that scrambled about him and appear as a fully capable adult. Anyone who took a glance, however, would recognize him to be quite a far cry from the man he so desperately tried to present. Zipping to the ground, she grew to her full, yet still diminutive height. Her bare feet planted in the grass, she drifted up to the conversing group, eyeing the fair, blonde-haired woman whose commanding, yet melancholy presence hinted that she might be the mother of her target. Then, her gaze fell upon Voltaire. \"Excuse me, sir.\" her small voice chimed timid and meek. It was not, perhaps her usual voice, but she had dealt with human men enough to know when one wanted to feel particularly masculine she merely had to act more feminine. \"Perhaps, if it is not too much trouble...I may trouble you for a dance?\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Elanwe was nothing if not eager to joining the celebrations of her fellow fae. As small as a candle she danced and sang with the clouds of fae that hovered above the partygoers. It was amazing to think, she had considered earlier in the day, that one of the humans that had been invited could look up, see that cloud and know each little fae had experiences that likely outstripped their respective lifetimes by a multiple of hundreds. Of course, that had been the sober thoughts of Midday Elanwe. Now, with the drink filling her belly with fire, and the intoxicating atmosphere she was feeling quite playful despite the time of day. Soon, however, the conversations of fae grew dull. The worst part about these parties was that, if you knew each other for centuries you had time to hear *all* of one-another's stories. But for the update of the past year she had heard everything these little rascals had to say and now they were taking turns listing off their funniest or most satisfying experiences of their lives. Bo-ring."}, "post-91008": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1559759187000", "message": "Voltaire was doing his best not to give in to the game of tag he was unceremoniously forced into. He wasn't exactly happy, and for many reasons.First, he hadn't wanted to move from the plantation estate in Aozora. He had friends there, a history there, but his enterprising mother had insisted they had to move to some place else so they could give the entirety of the estate to the Gauldish refugees.Second, he hadn't been happy with Foxgloves presence. Although Voltaire had enjoyed the sweet the peddler had tossed his way, he was still suspicious. And speaking of suspicious...Third, he didn't like Alden Marshall. He was too familiar with Voltaire's mother, even if he was more subtle about it than other men had been, and even if Alden had the pretty yet odd girl on his arm.Fourth, he was too old to be playing games with children, kittens, or kitten-children. Gabrielle was enjoying herself, obviously, but Voltaire wanted to explore the grounds.Another one of the blue-haired kidd knocked at his arm, obviously trying to get him to play. Voltaire, tall, dark haired, and blue eyed, merely rolled his eyes at the child and adjusted the sleeve of his tailored jacket.With the sound of parental conversation to one side and childish giggling to the other, the young man that was still technically growing into his shoulders, even if he was a good looking lad, turned to survey the festival...... And that's when he saw the enchanting fae creature coming his way.He swallowed, and then immediately tried to put on a debonair smile, like he was far more confident (and older) than he was.He chuckled when she said sir, and spoke. \"Call me Vol--\" his voice cracked and he cleared his throat, trying hard not to blush. \"Call me Voltaire.\" Her request to dance was met with an even broader smile. \"Trouble? It would be me pleasure.\" He offered his arm like a gentleman.\"Mother said not to stray,\" His annoying redheaded sister said as she paused in her game of tag with the kids.\"Be quiet,\" Voltaire said in a hushed whisper. \"It's just a dance.\"And then he gave a thousand watt smile to Elanwe and lead her toward the dance area.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Voltaire was doing his best not to give in to the game of tag he was unceremoniously forced into. He wasn't exactly happy, and for many reasons."}, "post-91011": {"user": "Nilanwe", "user_num": 3452, "timestamp": "1559771283000", "message": "Elanwe couldn't tell if the others had noticed her lure the boy away, but it didn't concern her. After all, who could blame a girl for wanting a dance at a party? Her meek smile broadened playfully as the younger boy's voice cracked but she did well to hide any amusement she might have gotten from it. Then, winking at the little girl who had shared her protest allowed Voltaire to leader her away, her hand around his elbow. \"Was that your family, Voltaire?\" she asked innocently. He had given his name so easily. She, on the other hand, might be keeping her own secret a little while longer. They soon  reached a patch of grass that had fae and elves of all sorts dancing upon it. Prancing happily to the jolly music that seemed to play itself from the stage. Reaching out she placed her hands lightly upon her partner's shoulders, staring up at him with her large, enchanting eyes. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Elanwe couldn't tell if the others had noticed her lure the boy away, but it didn't concern her. After all, who could blame a girl for wanting a dance at a party? Her meek smile broadened playfully as the younger boy's voice cracked but she did well to hide any amusement she might have gotten from it. Then, winking at the little girl who had shared her protest allowed Voltaire to leader her away, her hand around his elbow. "}, "post-91013": {"user": "Rook", "user_num": 2900, "timestamp": "1559772670000", "message": "When Gwenyth mentioned feet, Rook's grin only spread, breaking into a short burst of laughter as she nervously corrected herself. \"Well there's plenty you can learn from me.\" he added with a wink. \"I could teach you how to dance! Believe me, once you know how you'll find yourself wondering why you'd never learned to begin with! I've spent centuries in the woods, so let me add one thing from my own experiences: Acorns and rocks are going to be there next year and the year after that. The chance to have fun? That's what's truly fleeting.\" He brushed a lock of hair over one of his horns, revealing more of his handsome features. Yet he could already guess that she might very well be immune to something so simple as that. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When Gwenyth mentioned feet, Rook's grin only spread, breaking into a short burst of laughter as she nervously corrected herself. "}, "post-91032": {"user": "Gwyneth Sol", "user_num": 3174, "timestamp": "1559828021000", "message": "\"I... I suppose for a b-bit, it may not hurt.\" She stammered a bit. She couldn't really see a fault in his reasoning. And she didn't want to come off as rude, of course. That was often what her awkwardness was mistaken for unfortunately. \"B-But I am dreadfully clumsy at everything but for mixing medicines and potions.\" Gwyneth was not blind, she did physically acknowledge that the satyr was of a handsome disposition, but as he thought, it didn't really register for her. As she was, companionship was a secondary concern, both of friendship and romantically. She couldn't imagine anyone finding an interest in her, so she supposed it went both ways. She set her untouched cup on a stray stump for a moment, only to have it stolen away by another passing spirit in her motions to set her staff in the holster that slung across her back. She very rarely- if ever- set aside her staff and evidenced by the cup being stolen away, it didn't exactly leave her in a comfort to leave it out of her sight. \"Ah so... how...?\" She said after a moment, dropping her cloak over her staff, the crystal poking out from behind her now. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I... I suppose for a b-bit, it may not hurt.\" She stammered a bit. She couldn't really see a fault in his reasoning. And she didn't want to come off as rude, of course. That was often what her awkwardness was mistaken for unfortunately. \"B-But I am dreadfully clumsy at everything but for mixing medicines and potions.\" "}, "post-91049": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1559872446000", "message": "\"Not really,\" Voltaire answered, carefully spoken as he wanted to keep his deepened timbre even. Puberty had been good to Voltaire in giving him height and filling out his arms and chest, as well as squaring his jaw. His voice had deepened too, but as Elanwe discovered, it tended to crack when he got too excited.And he was most definitely excited. Giddy at the very least. His heart was pumping at a quicker crescendo, and his blood was racing just a little faster. He tried to look around at the festival do he wasn't constantly staring at the lilac darling on his arm. She was so tiny! And so beautiful...\"It's just my sister. Do you have sisters?\" He asked, as he stopped on the dancing circle and turned to face her.His Adam's apple bobbed as he circled one arm around her and held her other hand. Voltaire was an accomplished dancer under his mother's tutelage, but he was afraid he might trip over his feet as he fell into Elanwe's eyes.Miraculously, he whirled her into the dance on tempo and completely forgot whatever it was he'd asked the fae creature.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Not really,\" Voltaire answered, carefully spoken as he wanted to keep his deepened timbre even. Puberty had been good to Voltaire in giving him height and filling out his arms and chest, as well as squaring his jaw. His voice had deepened too, but as Elanwe discovered, it tended to crack when he got too excited."}, "post-91066": {"user": "Khepri", "user_num": 2653, "timestamp": "1559943923000", "message": "Khepri welcomed the drink with more mirth than she would have had without it. She thanked Freya briefly and eyed the fae that swooped away with the tray. The drink had better not have been poisoned.\"... it swooped through the window while I was sleeping. My keeper tried to catch it but avoided her attempts and landed in my arms. I woke up to her trying to reach beneath me to grab it.\" Her head lashed back in laughter. \"She tried to explain herself but she won't be living it down for as long as the memory lives.\"The Bird smelled the mead suspiciously before taking a sip. The part of her that was descended from her God would likely take care of any poison while she stayed beneath the sun. It was what would happen after that she was worried about. Her fragile human form couldn't even handle raw meat.\"And of you? How did you receive your invitation?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Khepri welcomed the drink with more mirth than she would have had without it. She thanked Freya briefly and eyed the fae that swooped away with the tray. The drink had better not have been poisoned."}, "post-91067": {"user": "A Spirit Guardian", "user_num": 3043, "timestamp": "1559944535000", "message": "\"A pity. This music does demand it,\" she commented with a smile. \"Nor does it ask for anything ever learned. I do not believe I have been taught, just observed. I often stirred the wind too wild if I were to join. Here, however... things may be less wild.\"When warned about the Usque, she nodded. \"It would not be for many moons yet. Even my journey took more time than I have ever taken to travel. In your realm, it will be longer. The whispers might just reach you before their arrival if I can wrestle the wilds well enough on the way.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"A pity. This music does demand it,\" she commented with a smile. \"Nor does it ask for anything ever learned. I do not believe I have been taught, just observed. I often stirred the wind too wild if I were to join. Here, however... things may be less wild.\""}, "post-91068": {"user": "Kauri Graves", "user_num": 2656, "timestamp": "1559945057000", "message": "\"If only I were apter in magic. Alas, it was never my strong suit,\" she told Genevieve. Kauri knew Alden would likely have figured it out, but he wasn't alarmed by it, so there must have been no malevolent magic involved.When the blonde Gauldin woman spoke Kauri burst into a racket of uncomfortable giggles. Her hand pressed over her mouth tightly.\"Oh, um, well, ah, hah, you see-\" She reached over to grab a flask of ale as a fairy passed by. \"I'm not sure that's, you know, quite a priority at the moment, we've not, er, gone that far. With everything. Time, time will tell. Ahaha.\"She took a swig.\"But they all seem to be getting along rather well, yes? Anyway, tell me more about this shop of yours. I must have left Isra before you opened it. I'd love to give you my patronage.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"If only I were apter in magic. Alas, it was never my strong suit,\" she told Genevieve. Kauri knew Alden would likely have figured it out, but he wasn't alarmed by it, so there must have been no malevolent magic involved."}, "post-91072": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1559946646000", "message": "\"I would rather make the music,\" she said honestly. \"I sing and play,\" she indicated the stringed instrument at her back. \"And I am not fond of being too close to people I don't know. Not after the things I have seen.\" She looked down. \"I also have a companion waiting for me. I don't want to leave him waiting for too long by getting preoccupied. As far as the Usque goes, I don't think you would notice time very much there.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I would rather make the music,\" she said honestly. \"I sing and play,\" she indicated the stringed instrument at her back. \"And I am not fond of being too close to people I don't know. Not after the things I have seen.\" She looked down. \"I also have a companion waiting for me. I don't want to leave him waiting for too long by getting preoccupied. As far as the Usque goes, I don't think you would notice time very much there.\""}, "post-91104": {"user": "Lady Genevieve St. James", "user_num": 875, "timestamp": "1560102562000", "message": "Genevieve's lilac eyes looked away from the children playing tag to look at Kauri. Magic was as normal to Genevieve as the skin on her body. Indeed, she could not HELP but to put magic into the things she touched, which is why Genevieve had been so adept at making enchanting clothing, and why the furniture, homes, and carriages she constantly used began to be \"alive\" and ever-faithful to her and her loved ones.Genevieve was a fateweaver, and what she loved -- a certain pen, a certain tea service, a dress, a cloak, a necklace -- began to thrive. And when she felt sadness, all of those things began to wilt. In her darkest days at the hotel in Gauldin, she had caused that penthouse suite to become gray and flat, drooping, eroding, ever more brittle as she sank deeper and deeper into her depression until finally the foundation of the hotel DID splinter when she'd--The golden-haired woman stopped thinking about that, and instead focused back onto the conversation at hand. \"Oh, I beg your pardon,\" she said gently, her Gaudlish accent making her low and smooth voice almost musical. \"I had not realized.\"She was grateful for the topic change.\"My history with Isra has been, how you say, touch and go. Sometimes my shop in Isra is open, sometimes no, but now I have begun an enterprise to make a... mm, shall we call it an indoor market? I am still not sure what the correct term is, but I have come to realize the world has many, many talented artisans and I want to make a place where anyone can shop for quality items. Not just dresses and gloves and boots, but... perhaps perfumes, special pens, jewelry, quality teas and wines.\" Genevieve mildly gestured as she spoke, her brow very, very softly furrowed as she tried to explain her idea even though she hadn't the right words. Out of the corner of her eye, she saw that Voltaire stepped away with a young fae woman after a brief exchange with his redheaded little sister. Genevieve glanced away from Kauri and Alden to look over at Voltaire for a moment... it seemed only a harmless dance. For now. Genevieve looked back to Kauri but made a mental note to check on Voltaire in a moment to make sure he was still dancing.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Genevieve's lilac eyes looked away from the children playing tag to look at Kauri. Magic was as normal to Genevieve as the skin on her body. Indeed, she could not HELP but to put magic into the things she touched, which is why Genevieve had been so adept at making enchanting clothing, and why the furniture, homes, and carriages she constantly used began to be \"alive\" and ever-faithful to her and her loved ones."}, "post-91112": {"user": "Alden Marshal", "user_num": 794, "timestamp": "1560118981000", "message": "As was often the case Alden was almost sidelined in the conversation. Well, that was the wrong word. That implied that he was being forced out when in reality he simply was not contributing. It was a consistent problem with him and he realized that he was doing it again. Rather than socializing his gaze had been focused on the other guests.Every form, every shape, every interaction and movement that he could see was taken in. Itemized, evaluated, and sorted in his mind into potential threats, avenues of attack, or means of escape. Which did not mean he was not listening to the conversation, only that he was not engaging in it and he realizes that this was an area he still needed to work on.\"I think you are doing yourself too little credit,\" Alden states abruptly as Kauri chuckles nervously and Genevieve soothes.\"The children are, admittedly, easy to get along with but they still like Kauri a great deal and they understand the nature of the relationship between myself and you. I think that the acclimation is going well and any when a transition comes it will go smoothly.\" The children were disappointed that Voltaire ditched them but the young Gabrielle was making up for it. They were having quite a lot of fun and it was clear that the group were as thick as thieves already. Forming fast bonds the way only children could. Alden's eyes also followed Voltaire but he tore them away, he was supposed to relax, or at least somewhat relax, tonight. \"That sounds like an interesting idea. The kind of business proposition The Empress herself might put forth. Are looking for potential investors?\" Alden inquires. He was familar with the basics of economics but was far removed from an expert. Still, if the question was a matter of capital he had that to spare. He had a generous wage that he barely used. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As was often the case Alden was almost sidelined in the conversation. Well, that was the wrong word. That implied that he was being forced out when in reality he simply was not contributing. It was a consistent problem with him and he realized that he was doing it again. Rather than socializing his gaze had been focused on the other guests."}, "post-91131": {"user": "Freya Haldar", "user_num": 3107, "timestamp": "1560166852000", "message": "\"Really? It just flew right into your bed?\" Freya raised a surprised brow and chuckled lightly when she told about how this keep had tried to reach in and take the letter. \"Who is this keeper? Some kind of servant?\" she asked curiously. \"The letter I received came with... a fox.\" Freya said and sipped her mead as if she didn't expect anyone to believe that - they certainly hadn't in Taingaard - but remembered that were currently standing in the middle of a ring of fungi with flying waiters and she was talking to a half bird. \"Well it just came to me with the letter in its mouth - not that I'm not communing with animals normally since I'm a druid, but even for me that was a first.\" Freya explained and frowned inquisitively. \"Tell me... do you just... fly off to anywhere you want to go and see? No obligations or anything?\" Freya knew she was considered quite free to do whatever she wanted by her father - including seeking out something like this - but what Khepri seemed to do was another level of freedom. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Really? It just flew right into your bed?\" Freya raised a surprised brow and chuckled lightly when she told about how this keep had tried to reach in and take the letter. \"Who is this keeper? Some kind of servant?\" she asked curiously. "}, "post-91159": {"user": "Jochi", "user_num": 3206, "timestamp": "1560215379000", "message": "Upon mentioning that she was there to play music, not dance to it, the delicate, fluttering notes of a flute sounded behind Faisine. Slowly approaching them, having finished his conversation with the boy, was the long-haired young man who had entered with the demigoddess.A few fairies had taken to dancing around him mirthfully as he played, his fingers spidering up and down the silvery instrument. He gave a wink to the Guardian of the Uske before tilting his chin toward the stage, asking her to join him. He then side-eyed the spirit, asking her to do her part, as well.Smiling, Lady Nemo began to back away. \"It was a pleasure speaking to you. Perhaps I can have the pleasure of hearing you play since I cannot have you dance.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Upon mentioning that she was there to play music, not dance to it, the delicate, fluttering notes of a flute sounded behind Faisine. Slowly approaching them, having finished his conversation with the boy, was the long-haired young man who had entered with the demigoddess."}, "post-91161": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1560217637000", "message": "Faisine nearly jumped out of her skin when someone appeared behind her, but luckily remained still and impassive. Her eyes moved to the man in question, and he invited her to play. With a nod, she pulled her citole in front of her, quickly tuned as she walked\u2026 if one looked at her, they might actually see the air shift if a sour note was plucked. She murmured some things to the man, giving him the count of beats per measure, a key of tune, and she sat down. She strummed a few times to begin just to make sure all was in tune, and began to pluck notes until he was able to match her.There was something oddly magical\u2026 literally\u2026 about her singing and playing. The wind seemed to shift and the air bended and molded around them, and various images may or may not pop into the thoughts of those who stood by listening. Her voice was as pure and sweet as a songbird\u2019s, each note and melody precise and trained.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Faisine nearly jumped out of her skin when someone appeared behind her, but luckily remained still and impassive. Her eyes moved to the man in question, and he invited her to play. With a nod, she pulled her citole in front of her, quickly tuned as she walked\u2026 if one looked at her, they might actually see the air shift if a sour note was plucked. She murmured some things to the man, giving him the count of beats per measure, a key of tune, and she sat down. She strummed a few times to begin just to make sure all was in tune, and began to pluck notes until he was able to match her."}, "post-91164": {"user": "Kauri Graves", "user_num": 2656, "timestamp": "1560217884000", "message": "Kauri spat out just a little of her drink when Alden mentioned the word transition. Luckily, her cup had been raised to her lips at the time and the motion was unnoticeable... to anyone that was a fool. She tried to recover as smoothly as she could, wiping ale from her chin with a small cough.She begged to change the subject so desperately she focused solely on Genevieve, who she did have a genuine interest for. She listened readily at Genevieve's proposal, eyes widening just a tad bit.\"That's rather perfect!\" she chirped. \"My parents, they ran a business creating special leather covers and paper to use in spellbooks. That would be a good place for them to supply their wares. There's also another Fletcher in Isra, an artificer who was demonstrating quite a few little trinkets and weapons. Reggie... Regina, I think it was. I caught her address for some shopping of my own. I could give it to you when we next see you if you'd like!\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kauri spat out just a little of her drink when Alden mentioned the word "}, "post-91167": {"user": "Khepri", "user_num": 2653, "timestamp": "1560220943000", "message": "\"Hmm. I see her as my servant, but she would see herself more as my protector. Neither are wrong,\" Khepri told the druid. She drummed her fingers against her chin and narrowed her eyes for a moment, pupils flicking toward the ground. \"Though... perhaps I am starting to see things a bit differently now. Companionship in the way humans feel it.\"Gazing back up into Freya's eyes, she listened to her story of retrieving her own letter. \"A fox? Well, that is certainly a rather charming way to receive a letter. This ... fae, they are different from my own people in their strong sense of camaraderie with the nature around them. Animals certainly aren't as friendly around me as they are around these fair folk. I can get along with most of the birds, but you'd have a hard time seeing me try to ride a horse!\"Pausing, she floated in an arc above the redhead. The Bird splayed her wings outward to show her. \"With these, I can go anywhere, do anything, yes. I imagine I could be more carefree and life would be good. I already give myself time to enjoy the fruits of being made of the currency that humans like to trade, as is my nature to do so. I was made to please and be pleasured, but I have a goal that I must achieve that is higher than myself... so perhaps after that, we will see how languid my life can become. You'd be free to join me, should I get that far.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Hmm. I see her as my servant, but she would see herself more as my protector. Neither are wrong,\" Khepri told the druid. She drummed her fingers against her chin and narrowed her eyes for a moment, pupils flicking toward the ground. \"Though... perhaps I am starting to see things a bit differently now. Companionship in the way humans feel it.\""}, "post-91181": {"user": "Lady Genevieve St. James", "user_num": 875, "timestamp": "1560270087000", "message": "\"I wanted to get my contracts in place before I approached the Empress,\" Genevieve said to Alden, unsure on whether she wanted to share her proposal with other investors. It wasn't so much due to greed on profit margins, as it was that Genevieve had a very specific vision and didn't want to be at odds with others who felt they had a say -- or a right -- in the matter.Kauri's enthusiasm had Genevieve smiling that warm smile again, never quite showing her teeth but friendly all the same. \"I would greatly appreciate that. Indeed, I will be traveling to Quying and then Tawakoshi soon, so perhaps after I return I could use that information, and a friend in town.\" Her maternal timer chimed down and she once again glanced over to the dancers to see Voltaire was still wrapped around his lady. \"Do either of you know the girl dancing with my son?\" Genevieve asked them, gesturing to the lilac-hued fae woman that was smiling so lovely up at the tall and somewhat gangly dark-haired youth. Nearby, the laughter of the children playing tag still chimed, Gabrielle's red curls bouncing as she ran with her enchanted doll running along beside her.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I wanted to get my contracts in place before I approached the Empress,\" Genevieve said to Alden, unsure on whether she wanted to share her proposal with other investors. It wasn't so much due to greed on profit margins, as it was that Genevieve had a very specific vision and didn't want to be at odds with others who felt they had a say -- or a right -- in the matter."}, "post-91205": {"user": "Alden Marshal", "user_num": 794, "timestamp": "1560302410000", "message": "\"Understandable, if you require any help you have but to ask and I will render it,\" Alden says simply. The offer was sincere and whether she knew it or not it was a generous one. Money and business decisions were two things Alden knew very little about so his offer was essentially political clout and capital without reservation. Honestly, a less scrupulous soul could take Alden for a ride quite easily if it was not for his matron backing him.Genevieve draws Alden's attention back to the dancers. His eyes narrow and he exams the magical auras clinging to the girl, the gathering was such a riot of colors it was almost impossible to see anything certain but ultimately he shakes his head. \"No, I do not know her.\" His expression turns remote, distant. \"But she is fae so you may wish to caution the boy. Just because the Chesknight guarantees safety does not mean necessarily mean he would prevent someone from willingly leaving the fair with a fae.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Understandable, if you require any help you have but to ask and I will render it,\" Alden says simply. The offer was sincere and whether she knew it or not it was a generous one. Money and business decisions were two things Alden knew very little about so his offer was essentially political clout and capital without reservation. Honestly, a less scrupulous soul could take Alden for a ride quite easily if it was not for his matron backing him."}, "post-91239": {"user": "Freya Haldar", "user_num": 3107, "timestamp": "1560461169000", "message": "It was difficult for Freya to comprehend why the bird woman had need for such a thing as a servant or the likes - but she was going to try and find out.\"You seem quite... lively so why having servants? I understand some people of royal descend do it out of...\" Freya said and whispered with a wry smile. \"Laziness...\" she added. \"But you don't seem like that?\"\"Well... animals have different tempers, and perhaps your affinity towards being a bird don't really match well with that temper of horses?\" Freya proposed and shrugged. \"It's like... I'm a druid and shape shifter, but there is only one animal I can shape shift into, because it matches the temper of my spirit. A snow panther apparently.\" Freya shrugged, not even she knew why exactly that animal was the one she matched, but it was rather convenient for her to say the least.Her head tracing the bird above her with calm precision she wondered what she meant.\"What kind of goal is this, miss Khepri?\" she asked but shook her head slowly at her proposal to join her. \"I'm not at liberty to throw everything away for pleasure and indulgence I'm afraid.\" Freya was adamant, however still curious to this quite fascinating being. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "It was difficult for Freya to comprehend why the bird woman had need for such a thing as a servant or the likes - but she was going to try and find out."}, "post-91251": {"user": "Jochi", "user_num": 3206, "timestamp": "1560526287000", "message": "Though the young man followed Faisine's instructions, his own playing was not so meticulous. The notes coming from his flute were carefree and sprightly, sometimes mimicking his bouncy steps, sometimes expressing the mischievous smirk curled about his face.Mingling with the magic of the enchanting Faisine was his own magic, further enhancing the effect to all that would come close enough to partake. Here and there, he would play a melody much more intricate and harder to follow, challenging the woman to match with a devilish expression.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Though the young man followed Faisine's instructions, his own playing was not so meticulous. The notes coming from his flute were carefree and sprightly, sometimes mimicking his bouncy steps, sometimes expressing the mischievous smirk curled about his face."}, "post-91252": {"user": "Kauri Graves", "user_num": 2656, "timestamp": "1560526976000", "message": "Kauri's attention shifted to the lavender fae that had whisked Genevieve's son away for a dance. Her eyes narrowed ever so slightly. She was incredibly well acquainted with the antics of the fair folk, having spent so much time with them as a child, having once been kidnapped by them and dragged into a realm where time escaped her and sweet, dreamlike adventures coaxed her to stay.She reached out a hand to place it gently on Genevieve's arm but didn't look at her. She kept her eyes squarely on the boy. \"Keep around him. They can take someone away in an instant, sometimes before one has the chance to blink. I doubt they would treat him badly if they did take him, but... you might never see him again. Even the Marshal might not be able to find him if he tried. It happened to me once. It's a miracle I ever got out.\"Some of the mirth that was in her voice earlier melted away as she spoke. Panic didn't seize her heart for the magic that was cast on this place but there was a lurking wariness that did decide to shake her.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kauri's attention shifted to the lavender fae that had whisked Genevieve's son away for a dance. Her eyes narrowed ever so slightly. She was incredibly well acquainted with the antics of the fair folk, having spent so much time with them as a child, having once been kidnapped by them and dragged into a realm where time escaped her and sweet, dreamlike adventures coaxed her to stay."}, "post-91253": {"user": "Lady Genevieve St. James", "user_num": 875, "timestamp": "1560529327000", "message": "\"Hm,\" Genevieve said, a thoughtful sound as she slipped her hand into the long skirt of her luxurious overcoat and pulled out a small piece of paper and a tiny pencil. It was a habit from her days as a seamstress, although she hadn't made an article of clothing in a good long while.After Odette died, her passion had faded and had been replaced instead with an aching need for something else, some other purpose that Genevieve was still trying to find.In any case, the golden-haired enchantress scrawled something on the piece of paper, and if either Kauri or Alden picked up on magic, they'd feel it now from Genevieve's fingertips as she finished writing and tore the piece of paper from the pad. The magic felt maternal and good, warm like a hearth, as wholesome as Yule Morning, and yet, as binding as steel.The paper came alive on its own, resting in Genevieve's palm as it folded itself into a tiny, tiny, barely a half inch tall hummingbird. It hovered over Genevieve's palm, nodded to her, then fluttered away to Voltaire.\"Maman! Maman!\" Gabrielle said breathlessly as she ran back to Genevieve, cat-eared children beside her. \"We are so hungry and thirsty and might I have some faerie shoes, too?\"Six catchild voices immediately echoed the sentiment.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Hm,\" Genevieve said, a thoughtful sound as she slipped her hand into the long skirt of her luxurious overcoat and pulled out a small piece of paper and a tiny pencil. It was a habit from her days as a seamstress, although she hadn't made an article of clothing in a good long while."}, "post-91258": {"user": "Khepri", "user_num": 2653, "timestamp": "1560543858000", "message": "\"Lively, of course, but I'm no fighter and even for someone like myself these lands can be dangerous,\" she told her. \"My servant is a warrior. She keeps me safe... or, well, as safe as she can manage. Now and again I'm the one helping her.\" The Bird tittered, thinking back to their first meeting with a knight errant that just about flattened Roxanne with his war steed.\"A snow panther! I can't say I've ever seen such a thing. Then perhaps birds and panthers get along as well,\" she teased, reaching out to twirl a strang of Freya's hair around her finger before letting it fall back down along her shoulders.\"My goal...\" Khepri hesitated. It was the first time anyone had asked since she had escaped. Not Roxy, Regal, Rudiger, nor Deidra had ever so much as inquired as to why she was around, down here, instead of up in the skies at her home. She complained often enough about the Lands Below to make them curious, surely. \"I will be reclaiming my home from a corrupt Esfinge- to you that would be like the Tain, a leader among their kind. Such things will not be easy I've been branded a traitor for a murder I did not commit. But soon. Soon! I shall show them the truth!\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Lively, of course, but I'm no fighter and even for someone like myself these lands can be dangerous,\" she told her. \"My servant is a warrior. She keeps me safe... or, well, as safe as she can manage. Now and again I'm the one helping "}, "post-91265": {"user": "Nilanwe", "user_num": 3452, "timestamp": "1560553129000", "message": "As Voltaire detailed, at least in part, the nature of his family Elanwe watched with some interest his young, expressive face still flushed with youth. Naturally his answer had only created more questions but now they were dancing. Oh, and what a dance it was! She had expected him stumbling over his feet so much as he had his own words and yet he pulled her gracefully around the large circle of grass they had cordoned off on their own. She realized with some surprise that her drink addled mind was having a difficult time matching the stone-sober coordination and her wing fluttered only slightly as she abandoned any hope of matching his step and instead floated centimeters from the dancing grounds. \"Ah, Voltaire, you're such a good dancer!\" she cooed, her voice tonged with genuine awe. For a human so young to know these sorts of talents, she could only assume he were some sort of nobility. His diction was too distinct, stance too regal to be anything but.  \"Where does milord hail from?\" she asked, as politely as she could. A more sober Elanwe would guess she was perhaps laying on the act a little *too* thick, though either way she doubted the boy would notice. Even if he did, he may attribute it to her fae tendencies. With a glance of her large eyes she caught sight once again of the one she assumed was his mother trying to peer inconspicuously at them.  Alden was indeed right about one thing: No one would dare do anything untowards to a guest here at such a sacred festival. If someone were to leave of their own free will, however, that was their business.  With a light tug, disguised as a particularly energetic sweep across the dance floor she pulled Voltaire only just, leading him outside the visual range of his guardians. Around them Fae danced and sang in a colorful cacophony of light and energy, shielding them from any who would try and see them, were they not to insert themselves onto the dance floor. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As Voltaire detailed, at least in part, the nature of his family Elanwe watched with some interest his young, expressive face still flushed with youth. Naturally his answer had only created more questions but now they were dancing. Oh, and what a dance it was! She had expected him stumbling over his feet so much as he had his own words and yet he pulled her gracefully around the large circle of grass they had cordoned off on their own. She realized with some surprise that her drink addled mind was having a difficult time matching the stone-sober coordination and her wing fluttered only slightly as she abandoned any hope of matching his step and instead floated centimeters from the dancing grounds. "}, "post-91272": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1560566177000", "message": "It was perhaps the way their magic mingled, or the crowd within the area, but she heard a whistle in her ears that started low and then to grow louder. Her heart beat was picking up and slamming against her rib cage. The young woman stopped playing abruptly and stared at the crowd for a long moment, not seeing the actual faces, but the mass of bodies swarming from days of the past. Had it been folly to accept the challenge of another? When the laughter turned into cries in her mind, she cast a look of genuine distress toward the man who'd challenged her. It all came rushing back to her; the scent of smoke... acrid in her nostrils even as nobody else could know what she was re-experiencing. It was too much.She had come to the festival with the hopes of enjoying herself but it had all been a foolish notion on her part. Faisine quickly gathered her things and strapped them with trembling fingers before she sent a second, this time panicked yet apologetic look to the one who had obviously just wanted to have a good time playing music.Too many people, she thought as a cold sweat rolled down her spine. She took off like a shot then, her goal was to get away from the crowd, and she would find herself slipping through the trees until the music and the chatter were but muted sounds behind her. It wouldn't be hard to follow her at all, she didn't go far, just enough that she could compose herself and hopefully catch her breath.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "It was perhaps the way their magic mingled, or the crowd within the area, but she heard a whistle in her ears that started low and then to grow louder. Her heart beat was picking up and slamming against her rib cage. The young woman stopped playing abruptly and stared at the crowd for a long moment, not seeing the actual faces, but the mass of bodies swarming from days of the past. Had it been folly to accept the challenge of another? When the laughter turned into cries in her mind, she cast a look of genuine distress toward the man who'd challenged her. It all came rushing back to her; the scent of smoke... acrid in her nostrils even as nobody else could know what she was re-experiencing. It was too much."}, "post-91276": {"user": "Freya Haldar", "user_num": 3107, "timestamp": "1560583396000", "message": "The more the bird answered her questions the more appeared in Freya's mind. \"Then if your servant is your protector - how come she isn't with you in a place like this?\" Freya asked adding with a hushed voice. \"They do seem to take a bit offence to you being here.\" shrugging she tried to get the attention of more faeries extending her arm into the air, as she was feeling thirsty from all that chatting again and wondered if it was some kind of pollen that made her that keen. \"But... perhaps your lively nature just happens to draw you to places?\" she asked finding another glass of mead in her hand quite suddenly.\u00a0\"Well you can now..!\" Freya added in a dry tone with a smirk, but frowned a little when she curled her hair around her finger. Some people might see a gesture like that as being a bit intrusive, especially her own people, but having traveled quite a bit, Freya had learned to shrug such manners off. \"I've at least never seen birds and panthers at odds with each other.\" Freya said politely. \"Yes, your goal..?\" Freya crossed her arms in front of her waiting for her to elaborate. \"Taking back a whole kingdom you say? And you aren't quite a warrior?\" she raised a brow but then again remembered that her group had actually won the Hunt. \"I guess useful skills aren't limited to that of fighting since you did so well in the Hunt. But you'll need more than your own powers to take back your old place, don't you?\" Freya started to think she might have gone to the Hunt to form alliances with her people - which was a very common thing to do. \"Being wrongly accused of murder is no small thing and proving people wrong on that account if you have been set up, as an honorable goal in life.\" Freya commended Khepri. \"But if I may ask... who did you ki... ehrm... who was killed and what happened?\" Freya quickly correcting herself taking a sip noticing that this glass had a subtly different flavor than the last two. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The more the bird answered her questions the more appeared in Freya's mind. "}, "post-91283": {"user": "Alden Marshal", "user_num": 794, "timestamp": "1560609546000", "message": "Alden gave Kauri an odd look, one that she might not have seen before. It was the look of a man who wasn't certain how to respond to what had been said. He could not remember a time ever being used as an example in a statement and now that she'd done it he was unsure how he felt. Especially when it implied there was a chance he would fail in a task. He never failed before, he was far, far too stubborn for it.The look fades as the children approach the lot of them have played themselves to the point of exhaustion. The cat-eared children were clearly enamored of their new, slightly older, playmate, and as such, they were more than happy to lend their voice to her request. Alden nods at this and scans the clearing until he spots the food tables. \"There is food there. Remember your manners.\" His words carry weight with the children and though they are clearly excited at the chance to eat they make their way carefully through the crowds and join the line waiting to be served. Remarkably well behaved despite their rambunctious nature. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Alden gave Kauri an odd look, one that she might not have seen before. It was the look of a man who wasn't certain how to respond to what had been said. He could not remember a time ever being used as an example in a statement and now that she'd done it he was unsure how he felt. Especially when it implied there was a chance he would fail in a task. He never failed before, he was far, far too stubborn for it."}, "post-91314": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1560672460000", "message": "Voltaire was enamored.The longer he stayed in Elanwe's soft, pale arms, the longer he spun her svelte figure with the other glitter and color of the dancers, the longer he felt the warmth of her, he just sank deeper and deeper.Looking down at her, his bright blue eyes showed how quickly he was falling. \" You're so beautiful,\" he breathed, not even listening to whatever it was she said. He had to blink and refocus. \"I was raised on a plantation in Aozora, but my mother has moved so often for the last few years, I can hardly keep track...\" And he was feeling exhilerated and breathless under Elanwe's pale gaze. He didn't even notice the paper flit into his pocket and laughed with easy delight as she took a step to swirl them harder into the crowd.\"What is your name? I need to know more about you.\" Almost as much as this young, dark haired man needed to breathe.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Voltaire was "}, "post-91351": {"user": "Jochi", "user_num": 3206, "timestamp": "1560717683000", "message": "The young man's expectations of a fun, flirty time were quickly smashed upon witnessing the panic in Faisine's eyes. His playing stopped as abruptly as her own, drawing a few eyes that had been enjoying the back and forth between them, however brief. Before he could open his mouth to ask what was wrong, the woman darted off.Nemo, the spirit that the Guardian of the Usque had named, surged forward to chase but was stopped by the long-haired man. \"I believe this one was my fault somehow. Allow me to fix it,\" he asked of her, taking a pace that was not so swift as to further worry the distressed damsel but hurried enough to express concern. Thankfully, she hadn't journeyed a vast length from the festivities, allowing him to find her with ease. He didn't even need to use the gifts given to him by his bountiful goddess- bless her name.He stopped a respectable distance away, holding his hands up. His flute was put away in its holder at his side. \"Are you alright? May I come closer?\" he queried, making her know that she had the power to tell him to leave or to approach.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The young man's expectations of a fun, flirty time were quickly smashed upon witnessing the panic in Faisine's eyes. His playing stopped as abruptly as her own, drawing a few eyes that had been enjoying the back and forth between them, however brief. Before he could open his mouth to ask what was wrong, the woman darted off."}, "post-91355": {"user": "Khepri", "user_num": 2653, "timestamp": "1560719806000", "message": "What Freya had to say about the Bird's energy drawing her places hit the mark so clearly that perhaps even she didn't realize it. The magic that made up her being, her person, her soul, thrived not only on the sun but the experiences of every living thing around her. It was a secret that Khepri was not privy to, though the realization made her think. She did have remarkable luck finding Roxanne in those frozen mountains when she had been on the brink of death.\"You may be onto something. I used to think it was the other way around,\" she replied with a smirk. \"You are right about needing more than my own powers. I am able to sway the tides of battle- heavily, sometimes- but I do not inflict the wounds or shield the swords. I help others do so with incredible success, put them in a fervor that melts away their fear and tunnels their thoughts directly into the task at hand. I can ease their pain, close their wounds, put strength into their limbs. None of that is possible if I do not have anyone to give these boons to, however, so I am slowly building myself a small army. Reclaiming an aerie would make sure any one of the soldiers who follow me a life of riches, pleasure... power!\" She paused as she lifted herself into the air, clenching her fists in the midst of a passionate speech.Khepri floated down soberly, finding a seat at one of the nearby tables. She crossed her arms and moped.\"One of my patrons,\" she told Freya, eyes aimed down at the ground. \"The only one to believe me about the Bird who was rising too swiftly in the ranks, that she was corrupt and sick. He was... he was the last Esfinge. His term was coming to an end.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "What Freya had to say about the Bird's energy drawing her places hit the mark so clearly that perhaps even she didn't realize it. The magic that made up her being, her person, her soul, thrived not only on the sun but the experiences of every living thing around her. It was a secret that Khepri was not privy to, though the realization made her think. She did have remarkable luck finding Roxanne in those frozen mountains when she had been on the brink of death."}, "post-91359": {"user": "Kauri Graves", "user_num": 2656, "timestamp": "1560720824000", "message": "Despite all the miraculous things she had witnessed in her life- from dancing with faeries, held hostage in Paradise, teleported by Grandma, and making friends with demons- even little things such as Genevieve's little paper bird had her marveling like the children when they first walked into Midsomar. She knew the woman was an enchantress, but she never expected it when they pulled such tricks out of thin air.\"You make it seem so easy,\" Kauri told the Fateweaver. \"I'm envious! If only I could possess magic such as you did.\" Alas, Kauri trying to use magic was about as successful as a fish trying to climb a tree. At least it was always around her wherever she went. The thought did not make her so sad.When she watched it zoom away, she kept an eye on the plum-colored girl and the boy until they were out of view. Her stomach clenched, but she kept quiet about it. If Genevieve thought that was enough, she wouldn't try to butt in. \"Well, shouldn't we try to get something to eat too? I don't know about the two of you, but I'm starving!\"She had noted that little look that Alden had given her and chosen to ignore it... for now. She flashed him her own look with a raised eyebrow and a wry smile, but nothing further as she approached a table alongside the children.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Despite all the miraculous things she had witnessed in her life- from dancing with faeries, held hostage in Paradise, teleported by Grandma, and making friends with demons- even little things such as Genevieve's little paper bird had her marveling like the children when they first walked into Midsomar. She knew the woman was an enchantress, but she "}, "post-91373": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1560736995000", "message": "She spent a few moments reorienting herself. Faisine had her hands on her knees by the time the man who had taken her to play music, he was approaching at a respectful distance and she watched warily, taking a step back at first. After a moment or two, she seemed to force herself to calm down enough to nod, \"Yes. Sorry.\" She dropped her things and sat on the ground, hands returning to her knees, still visibly shaking. She wasn't looking at him, not yet anyway. The sound of her breath slowed, the trembling ebbed. The guardian used a cloth to pat away the sheen of sweat over her face.\"I should go,\" she said raggedly, \"Before that happens again.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She spent a few moments reorienting herself. Faisine had her hands on her knees by the time the man who had taken her to play music, he was approaching at a respectful distance and she watched warily, taking a step back at first. After a moment or two, she seemed to force herself to calm down enough to nod, \"Yes. Sorry.\" She dropped her things and sat on the ground, hands returning to her knees, still visibly shaking. She wasn't looking at him, not yet anyway. The sound of her breath slowed, the trembling ebbed. The guardian used a cloth to pat away the sheen of sweat over her face."}, "post-91391": {"user": "Lady Genevieve St. James", "user_num": 875, "timestamp": "1560798211000", "message": "Genevieve laughed, and it was a very soft, yet warm sound. She even smiled a little more broadly, a smile that truly did reach her enchanting eyes and made that subtle touch of sadness about her melt away. \"I have had years of practice, mademoiselle,\" Genevieve said to Kauri. She'd caught the exchanged look between the younger maiden and her beau, but wisely -- and politely -- decided to act like she hadn't seen it. \"If you like, once we have all returned to Isra, I could teach you some things.\"The children went tumbling over each other toward the food stands, and Genevieve's smile naturally faded into her placid yet approachable expression. She wasn't hungry at all, but she nodded her head to Kauri's suggestion. \"Of course. I have heard rumors that mortals were not supposed to eat the food of the fae, less they be trapped in their realm,\" Her beautiful gown swayed like water around her legs as she walked, whispering over the grass beneath her fine boots as they moved toward the food stands. The enchantress took one last look for Voltaire over her shoulder.She couldn't see him, and although that mildly troubled her, she knew that her little spell would tell her if anything terrible was happening to Voltaire.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Genevieve laughed, and it was a very soft, yet warm sound. She even smiled a little more broadly, a smile that truly did reach her enchanting eyes and made that subtle touch of sadness about her melt away. \""}, "post-91411": {"user": "Alden Marshal", "user_num": 794, "timestamp": "1560819842000", "message": "\"I'd rather you didn't.\" Alden comments, his tone not a command or demand of her behavior only a statement of preference. \"You are easier to see as you are now, it's nice.\" The comment may confuse Genevieve but Kauri may recall a conversation on the bank of the river no so long ago. She may then realize that now that she was bereft of magical auras Alden could better see her features with his rune scarred eyes.At Genevieve's words, Alden nods. \"I've heard the same thing. However, from what I understand the Chesknight has offered safe harbor in straight forward enough a way as to avoid possible misdirection. Still, I brought a picnic basket just to be on a safe side if that is preferred.\" The children would be quite disappointed since their were quite a few delights laid out but Alden would defer to the other two adults in his party. Genevieve, in particular, had arrived earlier so may have a better idea of how safe the food was.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I'd rather you didn't.\" Alden comments, his tone not a command or demand of her behavior only a statement of preference. \"You are easier to see as you are now, it's nice.\" The comment may confuse Genevieve but Kauri may recall a conversation on the bank of the river no so long ago. She may then realize that now that she was bereft of magical auras Alden could better see her features with his rune scarred eyes."}, "post-91438": {"user": "Freya Haldar", "user_num": 3107, "timestamp": "1560859296000", "message": "As she described her skills in battle Freya couldn't help but giggle and put her hand up to her mouth. \"You're a skjald then!\" Freya said and lit up. \"I think... you'd also call it a bard other place, and a skjald will also take up his own sword if necessary, but they sing and inspire courage to their allies through various methods and posses an optimism and belief in themselves which almost equals yours..!\" she praised Khepri and thought that even though their civilizations seemed so different on the surface, they were pretty alike underneath the skin... and feathers. \"Those are a lot of attractive things for the lone warriors, greedy adventurer and opportunistic fighter, but you do realize the flaw right? Such things will have any warlord sending you away from their halls knowing that if he backs you he'd lose every man or woman he sends - either to death or to riches and pleasure.\" Freya smirked knowing she was right, having stood by her fathers side in many of these instances and Erik explaining his reasons for and against. \"You do seem passionate though, but building an army one by one does seems... time consuming. Now I don't know how long you live, but perhaps by the time you consider your army done having found the last soldier, the ones your recruited first have no longer the strength to carry arms or lies buried teen feet under.\" Freya jested, having a little fun poking holes in her lofty dreams of being a warlord - also it might be hard and important advice, for she had a case that was noble and Freya hoped she would see it through with success. \"I'm surprised you didn't ask my father for soldiers when your received the honors?\" she poked again. The sadness Khepri felt reached Freya too, even in this place of pure mirth. \"I'm sorry to hear that, he must have been a very good person.\" she condoled. \"What is the importance of an 'esfinge' in your homeland though?\" she asked curiously. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As she described her skills in battle Freya couldn't help but giggle and put her hand up to her mouth. "}, "post-91578": {"user": "Jochi", "user_num": 3206, "timestamp": "1561156541000", "message": "The young man made a slow, easy approach. When he was just a few steps away, he crouched down, elbows on his knees. He looked at her with a mix of concern and curiosity, as he'd only once seen someone react so adversely to what was supposed to be a good, harmless time. Jochi didn't move to touch her and didn't even shuffle an inch closer, but after a small silence, he spoke:\"Before... what happens again?\" he asked. \"What happened? Was that something of my doing?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The young man made a slow, easy approach. When he was just a few steps away, he crouched down, elbows on his knees. He looked at her with a mix of concern and curiosity, as he'd only once seen someone react so adversely to what was supposed to be a good, harmless time. Jochi didn't move to touch her and didn't even shuffle an inch closer, but after a small silence, he spoke:"}, "post-91581": {"user": "Faisine of the Usque", "user_num": 46, "timestamp": "1561157647000", "message": "\"Oh... no... nono, it wasn't your fault sir... I... Just haven't been around people in a very long time and... Sometimes I see things from the past; particularly frightful things, when I hear people yelling. I... War.\" She looked away then, heat creeping into her cheeks. \"The last time I was near people was during war. If I walk away, maybe I won't see it anymore the way it was.\" She moved to her feet and looked down at her feet. \"It's stupid, I know, seeing things like that.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Oh... no... nono, it wasn't your fault sir... I... Just haven't been around people in a very long time and... Sometimes I see things from the past; particularly frightful things, when I hear people yelling. I... War.\" She looked away then, heat creeping into her cheeks. \"The last time I was near people was during war. If I walk away, maybe I won't see it anymore the way it was.\" She moved to her feet and looked down at her feet. \"It's stupid, I know, seeing things like that.\""}, "post-91583": {"user": "Kauri Graves", "user_num": 2656, "timestamp": "1561158178000", "message": "\"Well, I'll not do it in your presence,\" Kauri told Alden. \"But I'd love to learn a few tricks if I could, Genevieve.\" It sounded like a lovely way to get to know her. Hovering around Alden and going to all these gatherings that she would have otherwise avoided was becoming an excellent way to make good company. She couldn't recall having ever met so many prospective friends before.Looking at the food, Kauri dwelled on the prospective imprisonment ahead. They were certainly right about this on most occasions, but Midsomar was a different kind of celebration. The Cheknight was honorable, even though he was a fae.\"I believe we'll be fine,\" she told Genevieve, taking up one of those pastries filled with some kind of pink substance. Whatever it was, it was the sweetest thing she'd ever tasted... until it wasn't. The woman's face contorted from heavenly pleasure to an inverted sourness as the foul substance filled her mouth. Not wanting to spit in front of so much company, she placed her hands flat against her lips and drew up every ounce of will she could summon to swallow the substance. Some of the children caught sight of this and began to point and laugh at the ridiculous faces she was making.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Well, I'll not do it in your presence,\" Kauri told Alden. \"But I'd love to learn a few tricks if I could, Genevieve.\" It sounded like a lovely way to get to know her. Hovering around Alden and going to all these gatherings that she would have otherwise avoided was becoming an excellent way to make good company. She couldn't recall having ever met so many prospective friends before."}, "post-91633": {"user": "Khepri", "user_num": 2653, "timestamp": "1561334992000", "message": "\"That's it!\" exclaimed the bird, pointing at Freya enthusiastically. \"A skjald! That is the title your father gave me! Not often used among the kingdoms outside of Taingaard, but I happily flew with it.\"Addressing the murder of her patron and her plans, the courtesan rose and sat only on the edge of the seat, fingers steepled. \"My life... will undoubtedly be short in comparison to yours. In the very least, as everything that I am as Khepri. Five more years, maybe ten if I feel like I have more to do. I will not be dying, but I will be moving on. That is a discussion for another time, however!\"\"For the topic at hand, I think you're correct, but gathering compassion for my endeavor...\" Her fingers tapped rapidly on the seat as she sighed, \"Well, I'm not here to be pitied. I also don't believe your father took a particular liking to me. He saw the worst parts of myself and decided that he did not want anything to do with it. Those who have seen those parts of me and decide to keep coming back, however-\" She lifted a hand to her lips and grinned lovingly, \"-those are the ones I seek. Even if the worst parts of me have been little fabrications, they're palpable. It means that I have found those who are true and loyal. After all, they aren't even aware of the honor and glory and the... favors I have in store for them.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"That's it!\" exclaimed the bird, pointing at Freya enthusiastically. \"A skjald! That is the title your father gave me! Not often used among the kingdoms outside of Taingaard, but I happily flew with it.\""}, "post-91662": {"user": "Freya Haldar", "user_num": 3107, "timestamp": "1561402554000", "message": "\"Oh, he called you that?\" Freya said and smiled. \"That's a compliment for sure, skjalds in Taingaard are regarded almost as highly as Blood Warriors.\" she scratched her chin thinking back. \"I think one from your team got made Blood Warrior, really an honor.\" Freya persisted. Her eyes opened wide it was hard to contemplate that her lifespan was so short.\"Really? That short? I had guessed it was far longer...\" Freya looked down into her cup of mead fishing for a better topic but was preceded by Khepri herself and nodded. \"Yes. Yes indeed it is.\" she smiled. \"Ohh I'm not pitying you..! I was just suggesting a little... 'haste' I guess.\" Freya tried. \"I think...\" she thought about her words. \"When you gather people for our endeavor, send me a message okay..?\" Freya said with a smile feeling as if she could easily end up on Khepri's bandwagon - not for the power, money or pleasure, but purely because she felt her being right. \"I've enjoyed our talk, I hope... these people will be kind to you the rest of the night. I will take a look around, thanks for the company again, Miss Khepri!\" wishing her well, proceeding to take a look around adamant that she wasn't this tipsy when she arrived. Perhaps she could claim a nap beneath one of those large fungi when time was right...", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Oh, he called you that?\" Freya said and smiled. \"That's a compliment for sure, skjalds in Taingaard are regarded almost as highly as Blood Warriors.\" she scratched her chin thinking back. \"I think one from your team got made Blood Warrior, really an honor.\" Freya persisted. "}, "post-91760": {"user": "Lady Genevieve St. James", "user_num": 875, "timestamp": "1561659336000", "message": "\"I'm sure the faerie delectables will be fine,\" Genevieve said, assured by both Alden AND Kauri that the Chesknight had promised safe passage for those that were not fae. As the party moved over to the food booths, Genevieve couldn't help but turn her golden head to the dancers on the lawn, only to see a moping Voltaire come their way.\"Voltaire?\" Genevieve questioned, a touch of maternal concern in her voice as her enchanting blue eyes narrowed a little on him. Had he been enchanted?\"She's gone,\" Voltaire said with a heavy, love-worn sigh as he came up to her mother's side, easily her height and some as he looked back over his shoulder at the dancing, glittering couples. \"As quickly as she came, she is gone,\" he said and put a hand to his heart.Genevieve tried not to smile, while Gabrielle -- who had hung back by her mother, rolled her eyes, and picking up her autonomous doll, skipped ahead to join the rest. \"That is the way of the fae, darling,\" Genevieve said, and guided Voltaire to join the rest of them.They came upon the party just as Kauri bit into the sweet and seemed to enjoy herself... until she no longer was. The cat-eared children burst into laughter, and Gabrielle -- brought up to be a lady -- hid her giggle behind her palm. Her little doll clapped her hands, as the doll had no mouth (and Foxgloves had warned not to paint one on, too).\"Perhaps we will need that picnic basket after all,\" Genevieve said with a gleam of good humor to Alden.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I'm sure the faerie delectables will be fine,\" Genevieve said, assured by both Alden AND Kauri that the Chesknight had promised safe passage for those that were not fae. As the party moved over to the food booths, Genevieve couldn't help but turn her golden head to the dancers on the lawn, only to see a moping Voltaire come their way."}, "post-91811": {"user": "Jochi", "user_num": 3206, "timestamp": "1561745621000", "message": "Jochi lifted a hand and shook his head. \"Such things are not to be considered lightly. War does not just rend apart the body, but also the soul. Those who survive do not truly escape. Your suffering is real,\" he told her, extending a hand out to her.\"If you feel you need to leave, by all means. Though, I am here to give you company as well if you would have me.\" He gave her a tiny smile, one that made it clear that he understood the nature of her struggles, even if he didn't know her exact ailments. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Jochi lifted a hand and shook his head. \"Such things are not to be considered lightly. War does not just rend apart the body, but also the soul. Those who survive do not truly escape. Your suffering is real,\" he told her, extending a hand out to her."}}